Cerebrospinal fluid biomarkers for Alzheimer’s disease: diagnostic performance in a homogeneous mono-center population.The cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers amyloid-β (Aβ)(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau have good diagnostic accuracy for clinically diagnosed Alzheimer’s disease (AD). However, in multi-center studies, the predictive values of the CSF biomarkers have been lower, possibly due to differences in procedures for lumbar puncture and CSF handling and storage, and to differences in patient populations, clinical evaluations, and diagnostic procedures. Here we investigate the diagnostic accuracy of CSF biomarkers in a well defined homogeneous mono-center population. We also evaluate an extended panel of amyloid related biomarkers. Sixty consecutive patients admitted for cognitive impairment to a memory clinic were recruited. The participants included patients with AD or mild cognitive impairment (MCI) diagnosed with AD upon follow-up (n = 32), patients with stable MCI (n = 13), patients with other dementias diagnosed at primary evaluation or upon follow-up (n = 15), and healthy controls(n = 20). CSF was analyzed for Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau, and PA(X-38), Aβ(X-40), Aβ(X-42), sAβPPα, and sAβPPβ. In multivariate analysis, thecore biomarkers Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau demonstrated a high ability to diagnose AD versus the combined groups of controls and stable MCI, with an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) of 0.97 (95% CI 0.93–1.00, p < 0.0001). The additional biomarkers only marginally increased AUROC to 0.98 (95% CI 0.95–1.00, p < 0.0001), this increase mainly mediated by Aβ(X-42). In conclusion, CSF biomarkers Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau have very high diagnostic accuracy in a well defined cohort of untreated patients, demonstrating the excellent potency of CSF biomarkers to identify pathological processes in AD when astringent analytical protocol is used.Differential CSF biomarker levels in APOE-epsilon4-positive and -negative patients with memory impairment.To investigate the relationships between episodic memory, APOE genotype, CSF markers (total tau, T-tau; phospho-tau, P-tau; beta-amyloid, Abeta42) and longitudinal cognitive decline.124 memory clinic patients were retrospectively divided into 6 groups based on (i) episodic memory function (Rey Auditory Verbal Learning Test, RAVLT): severe, moderate or no impairment (SIM, MIM or NIM), and (ii) APOE genotype (epsilon4+ or epsilon4-). CSF marker levels and cognitive decline were compared across groups.Episodic memory function, according to RAVLT scores, was significantly correlated with CSF marker levels only among epsilon4+ subjects and not among epsilon4- subjects. When comparing the 6 subgroups, SIM epsilon4+ and MIM epsilon4+ groups showed significantly lower Abeta42 levels than the other groups. T-tau and P-tau levels were significantly increased in SIM epsilon4+ when compared to all the other groups, including the SIM epsilon4- group. However, both SIM epsilon4+ and SIM epsilon4- declined cognitively during the follow-up.It remains to be determined whether APOE genotype affects the expression of biomarkers in CSF, or whether the different biomarker patterns reflect different types of disease processes in patients with progressive cognitive dysfunction.Amyloid-beta42 plasma levels are elevated in amnestic mild cognitive impairment.Amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI) is considered a prodromal stage of Alzheimer's disease (AD). We measured plasma levels of amyloid-beta40 (Abeta40) and Abeta42 in 191 subjects with aMCI. Seventy-nine of them were clinically followed for two years. In the total cohort of aMCI cases, the average level of Abeta42, as well as the Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio, was significantly higher than those of the 102 cognitively normal age-matched subjects. The aMCI cases that converted to probable AD within 2 years had higher levels of Abeta42 and, to a lesser extent, Abeta40 than the stable cases. However the large variability of measured values indicates that plasma Abeta is not a suitable marker of incipient AD.Elevation of {beta}-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies in the blood of amnestic patients with mild cognitive impairment.To develop a blood-based test for screening populations at risk for Alzheimer disease.Case-control study. Subjects A total of 180 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and 105 age-matched, cognitively normal controls.The titer of beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies in the plasma was obtained at the time of diagnosis and evaluated by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay before and after dissociation of the antigen-antibody complexes. A total of 107 patients with MCI were followed up for 36 months; 70 of the 107 cases progressed to Alzheimer disease.The average level of beta-amyloid 1-42 plasma autoantibodies in patients with MCI that progressed to Alzheimer disease, but not that of the stable cases, was significantly higher than in cognitively normal controls (P < .001).The results suggest that the plasma beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies parallel beta-amyloid 42 deposition in the brain, which is known to precede by several years the clinical onset of Alzheimer disease. The evaluation of beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies after dissociation of the complexes is a simple and inexpensive method that can be used to predict the occurrence of Alzheimer disease.Evaluation of plasma Abeta(40) and Abeta(42) as predictors of conversion to Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Numerous studies have shown a marked decrease of beta-amyloid(42) (Abeta(42)) in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) of patients with incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD). However, studies on Abeta in plasma are contradictory, and show very marginal differences between patients and controls. Here, we analyzed plasma samples using a new multiplex immunoassay for simultaneous analysis of Abeta(1-40), Abeta(n-40), Abeta(1-42), and Abeta(n-42). The plasma samples were obtained at baseline from two independent cohorts of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and age-matched controls. In the first cohort, 41% of the 117 MCI cases converted to AD during a clinical follow-up period of 4-7 years. In the second cohort, 14% of the 110 MCI subjects developed AD during a clinical follow-up period of 2-4 years. None of the plasma Abeta isoforms differed between MCI patients that subsequently developed AD and healthy controls or stable MCI patients. The Cox proportional hazards model did not reveal any differences in the probability of progression from MCI to AD related to plasma Abeta levels. In contrast, low levels of Abeta(1-42) in CSF were strongly associated with increased risk of future AD. The absence of a change in plasma Abeta in incipient AD, despite the marked change in CSF, may be explained by the lack of a correlation between the levels of Abeta(1-42) in CSF and plasma. In conclusion, the results show that CSF biomarkers are better predictors of progression to AD than plasma Abeta isoforms.Cerebrospinal fluid tau and beta-amyloid 42 proteins identify Alzheimer disease in subjects with mild cognitive impairment.Cerebrospinal fluid tau protein and beta-amyloid 42 (Abeta42) protein are altered even in very mild Alzheimer disease (AD). So far, few data exist for subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).To investigate the potential of cerebrospinal fluid tau and Abeta42 for predicting progression from MCI to AD in a longitudinal study of 28 patients with MCI who received follow-up for 18 months.An 18-month prospective study.Clinical follow-up study of community-residing subjects with MCI.Cerebrospinal fluid tau and Abeta42 concentrations were measured using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay at baseline. The potential of both biomarkers was evaluated to predict the progression to dementia, the end point of this study, using multiple logistic regression analysis.Of 28 subjects with MCI, 12 progressed to dementia (2 to frontotemporal dementia; 10 to AD). Six subjects had progressive MCI, and 10 subjects showed stable MCI. Cerebrospinal fluid tau levels were significantly elevated in patients who progressed to probable AD (P =.002) and subjects with progressive MCI (P =.003) compared with subjects who had stable MCI. Cerebrospinal fluid Abeta42 levels were significantly lower in patients who progressed to probable AD (P =.007) and those with progressive MCI (P =.04) than in subjects with stable MCI. Logistic regression analysis identified elevated tau protein level as a predictor of cognitive deterioration (P =.02), whereas a delayed verbal recall score at baseline was significantly associated with the development of probable AD (P =.03).Our results indicate that altered tau and Abeta42 concentrations may be detectable in subjects who are clinically diagnosed as having MCI but demonstrate the pathological changes of AD.Plasma Abeta42 and Abeta40 as markers of cognitive change in follow-up: a prospective, longitudinal, population-based cohort study.Single measurements of plasma Aβ are not useful in the diagnostics of Alzheimer's disease (AD). However, changes in plasma Aβ levels during repeated testing may be helpful in the prediction and evaluation of progression of the incipient AD or mild cognitive impairment.To examine the relation of baseline and serial plasma Aβ levels to cognitive change in follow-up.269 subjects (52 cognitively impaired and 217 controls) from a population-based cohort were clinically followed up from 3 to 6 years. Serial plasma samples were available from 70 subjects who were followed up for 3 years and 43 subjects followed for 6 years. The plasma Aβ levels were measured using ELISA.Subjects who declined cognitively during the follow-up had lower levels of plasma Aβ42 at the baseline. Plasma Aβ42 and the Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio decreased (-2.4 pg/ml for Aβ42 in 6 years) in those who declined in follow-up, whereas Aβ42 and the Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio increased in the subjects who remained cognitively stable or improved in follow-up. Subjects using acetylsalicylic acid, dipyridamole, antidiabetic or anticoagulant drugs as well as subjects with coronary heart disease had higher levels of Aβ40.Low or decreasing plasma Aβ42 during the follow-up is associated with cognitive decline. Serial measurement of plasma Aβ42 may be useful in the detection of the subjects who are at risk for cognitive decline.[The role of CSF markers in the early diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease].Biomarkers in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) are being used increasingly to diagnose early Alzheimer's disease (AD). A CSF profile that is suggestive of ad is an abnormal ratio of the proteins Ab1-42 to total tau.To describe the prevalence and prognosis of a CSF profile in patients without dementia but with subjective memory problems and mild cognitive impairments (MCI) at a memory clinic.A multi-centre study.A European multi-centre study showed that a CSF AD profile was often present in patients with subjective complaints and patients with MCI . The CSF AD profile predicted a decline in cognition and daily functioning over a period of 3 years in patients with MCI. Patients with amnestic MCI and a CSF AD profile developed AD more often within this period than patients without this profile.CSF markers suggestive of ad are common in persons without dementia. It may be possible to use these markers for the prognosis of patients who have MCI .CSF soluble amyloid precursor proteins in the diagnosis of incipient Alzheimer disease.To explore if soluble amyloid precursor proteins (sAPP) in CSF improve the identification of patients with incipient Alzheimer disease (AD) in a group of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).A cohort study with follow-up assessments of 58 patients with MCI with baseline CSF sampling was conducted: 21 patients had progressed to probable AD (MCI-AD), 27 still had MCI, 8 had reverted to normal (MCI-NAD), and 2 patients with frontotemporal dementia (FTD) were excluded. Sixteen additional patients with FTD were included to explore the specificity of the CSF markers. CSF concentrations of sAPPα, sAPPβ, tau, and Aβ(1-42) were measured with sensitive and specific ELISAs. Associations between diagnostic status, CSF protein concentrations, and other patient characteristics were explored using multiple logistic regression analyses with stepwise variable selection. The optimal sensitivity and specificity of the best models were derived from receiver operating characteristic curves.The MCI-AD group had significantly higher sAPPβ concentrations than the MCI-NAD and the FTD groups. A combination of sAPPβ, tau, and age differentiated the MCI-AD and the MCI-NAD groups with a sensitivity of 80.00% and a specificity of 81.00%. The best model for the differentiation of the MCI-AD and the FTD groups included sAPPβ and tau, and showed a sensitivity of 95.20% and a specificity of 81.20%. Aβ(1-42) and sAPPα did not significantly contribute to the models.These findings suggest that sAPPβ may be clinically useful, and superior to Aβ(1-42), in the early and differential diagnosis of incipient AD.Two-year outcome of MCI subtypes and aetiologies in the Göteborg MCI study.The objective was to study the 2-year outcome of subjects diagnosed as having mild cognitive impairment (MCI).Two hundred and nine subjects diagnosed as having MCI were examined with a comprehensive neuropsychological test battery and followed up after 2 years.After 2 years, 34 subjects (16%) were lost for follow-up. Those subjects did not differ significantly in terms of MCI subclassification, MMSE score or age and education. Of the 175 subjects followed up, eight (4.5%) had improved to normal, two with amnestic MCI, one from multiple domains MCI, three with single domain MCI and two without any significant impairment at baseline. Forty-four subjects (25%) had progressed to dementia. Of these, 35 were from the multidomain amnestic group and nine from the multidomain non-amnestic group. The combination of Alzheimer-typical biomarkers (total-tau and amyloid beta) and multidomain amnestic MCI was the strongest predictor of progression to Alzheimer's disease, while vascular disease and multidomain amnestic MCI preceded mixed and vascular dementia.The results suggest that memory impairment alone, or impairment in any one cognitive domain alone, is a rather benign condition. Impairment in several cognitive domains is associated with a more severe outcome over 2 years. Also, 20% of the subjects who progressed to dementia, including Alzheimer's disease, did not show memory impairment at baseline, which suggests that memory impairment is not always the first symptom of even the most common dementia disorders.Plasma amyloid levels and the risk of AD in normal subjects in the Cardiovascular Health Study.To examine the association between incident Alzheimer disease (AD), and plasma A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels in normal and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) subjects in a subgroup of participants of the Cardiovascular Health Study Cognition Study.We determined the plasma A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels of 274 nondemented subjects (232 normals and 42 with MCI) in 1998-1999 and repeated the measurements in 2002-2003. The mean age of the subjects at baseline was 79.3 +/- 3.6 years. We examined the association between A beta levels and incident AD over the ensuing 4.5 years, controlling for age, cystatin C level (marker of glomerular function), apolipoprotein E-4 allele, Modified-Mini-Mental State Examination scores, and MRI-identified infarcts.In an unadjusted prospective model in normal subjects, both A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels in 1998-1999 were associated with incident AD (n = 55) in 2002-2003 (longitudinal analysis). In the fully adjusted multivariate model, neither A beta 1-42 nor A beta 1-40 nor their ratio was associated with incident AD. However, adjustment had a very small effect on point estimates for A beta 1-42, from an odds ratio (OR) of 1.61 (p = 0.007) in the unadjusted model to an OR of 1.46 (p = 0.08) in the fully adjusted model. In 2002-2003 (cross-sectional analysis), only the unadjusted models showed that both peptides were associated with AD.Plasma A beta levels are affected by age and by systemic and CNS vascular risk factors. After controlling for these conditions, A beta-40 and A beta 1-42 are weak predictors of conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) in normal subjects and are only weakly associated with AD in cross-sectional analysis. Consequently, plasma levels of A beta do not seem to be useful biomarkers for AD.Cerebrospinal fluid biomarkers for Alzheimer’s disease: diagnostic performance in a homogeneous mono-center population.The cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers amyloid-β (Aβ)(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau have good diagnostic accuracy for clinically diagnosed Alzheimer’s disease (AD). However, in multi-center studies, the predictive values of the CSF biomarkers have been lower, possibly due to differences in procedures for lumbar puncture and CSF handling and storage, and to differences in patient populations, clinical evaluations, and diagnostic procedures. Here we investigate the diagnostic accuracy of CSF biomarkers in a well defined homogeneous mono-center population. We also evaluate an extended panel of amyloid related biomarkers. Sixty consecutive patients admitted for cognitive impairment to a memory clinic were recruited. The participants included patients with AD or mild cognitive impairment (MCI) diagnosed with AD upon follow-up (n = 32), patients with stable MCI (n = 13), patients with other dementias diagnosed at primary evaluation or upon follow-up (n = 15), and healthy controls(n = 20). CSF was analyzed for Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau, and PA(X-38), Aβ(X-40), Aβ(X-42), sAβPPα, and sAβPPβ. In multivariate analysis, thecore biomarkers Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau demonstrated a high ability to diagnose AD versus the combined groups of controls and stable MCI, with an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) of 0.97 (95% CI 0.93–1.00, p < 0.0001). The additional biomarkers only marginally increased AUROC to 0.98 (95% CI 0.95–1.00, p < 0.0001), this increase mainly mediated by Aβ(X-42). In conclusion, CSF biomarkers Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau have very high diagnostic accuracy in a well defined cohort of untreated patients, demonstrating the excellent potency of CSF biomarkers to identify pathological processes in AD when astringent analytical protocol is used.Differential CSF biomarker levels in APOE-epsilon4-positive and -negative patients with memory impairment.To investigate the relationships between episodic memory, APOE genotype, CSF markers (total tau, T-tau; phospho-tau, P-tau; beta-amyloid, Abeta42) and longitudinal cognitive decline.124 memory clinic patients were retrospectively divided into 6 groups based on (i) episodic memory function (Rey Auditory Verbal Learning Test, RAVLT): severe, moderate or no impairment (SIM, MIM or NIM), and (ii) APOE genotype (epsilon4+ or epsilon4-). CSF marker levels and cognitive decline were compared across groups.Episodic memory function, according to RAVLT scores, was significantly correlated with CSF marker levels only among epsilon4+ subjects and not among epsilon4- subjects. When comparing the 6 subgroups, SIM epsilon4+ and MIM epsilon4+ groups showed significantly lower Abeta42 levels than the other groups. T-tau and P-tau levels were significantly increased in SIM epsilon4+ when compared to all the other groups, including the SIM epsilon4- group. However, both SIM epsilon4+ and SIM epsilon4- declined cognitively during the follow-up.It remains to be determined whether APOE genotype affects the expression of biomarkers in CSF, or whether the different biomarker patterns reflect different types of disease processes in patients with progressive cognitive dysfunction.Amyloid-beta42 plasma levels are elevated in amnestic mild cognitive impairment.Amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI) is considered a prodromal stage of Alzheimer's disease (AD). We measured plasma levels of amyloid-beta40 (Abeta40) and Abeta42 in 191 subjects with aMCI. Seventy-nine of them were clinically followed for two years. In the total cohort of aMCI cases, the average level of Abeta42, as well as the Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio, was significantly higher than those of the 102 cognitively normal age-matched subjects. The aMCI cases that converted to probable AD within 2 years had higher levels of Abeta42 and, to a lesser extent, Abeta40 than the stable cases. However the large variability of measured values indicates that plasma Abeta is not a suitable marker of incipient AD.Elevation of {beta}-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies in the blood of amnestic patients with mild cognitive impairment.To develop a blood-based test for screening populations at risk for Alzheimer disease.Case-control study. Subjects A total of 180 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and 105 age-matched, cognitively normal controls.The titer of beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies in the plasma was obtained at the time of diagnosis and evaluated by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay before and after dissociation of the antigen-antibody complexes. A total of 107 patients with MCI were followed up for 36 months; 70 of the 107 cases progressed to Alzheimer disease.The average level of beta-amyloid 1-42 plasma autoantibodies in patients with MCI that progressed to Alzheimer disease, but not that of the stable cases, was significantly higher than in cognitively normal controls (P < .001).The results suggest that the plasma beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies parallel beta-amyloid 42 deposition in the brain, which is known to precede by several years the clinical onset of Alzheimer disease. The evaluation of beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies after dissociation of the complexes is a simple and inexpensive method that can be used to predict the occurrence of Alzheimer disease.CSF Abeta42, tau and phosphorylated tau correlate with medial temporal lobe atrophy.Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers and medial temporal lobe (MTL) atrophy predict the progression of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD). We investigated the association between the CSF biomarkers and MTL atrophy and the ability of these measures to predict AD in MCI patients in the same study population. The study included 21 MCI patients of whom eight progressed to AD during the study. CSF biomarkers were measured by using ELISA method and volumes of MTL structures were assessed by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Abeta42 levels were lower and tau and phospho-tau levels were higher in progressive subjects. The progressive subjects had lower volumes in all MRI measures. Tau and phospho-tau correlated inversely with hippocampal volumes and left entorhinal cortex volume in the whole study group. In the stable group, tau correlated with hippocampal volumes. Phospho-tau [corrected] had a negative correlation whereas Abeta42 [corrected] exhibited a positive correlation with left hippocampal volume in the progressive group. These results indicate that both measures may reflect the ongoing neurodegenerative process in the progressive MCI patients. However, the order of the changes in the CSF biomarkers and MTL atrophy remain unclear due to a small number of studied subjects and study design.Evaluation of plasma Abeta(40) and Abeta(42) as predictors of conversion to Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Numerous studies have shown a marked decrease of beta-amyloid(42) (Abeta(42)) in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) of patients with incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD). However, studies on Abeta in plasma are contradictory, and show very marginal differences between patients and controls. Here, we analyzed plasma samples using a new multiplex immunoassay for simultaneous analysis of Abeta(1-40), Abeta(n-40), Abeta(1-42), and Abeta(n-42). The plasma samples were obtained at baseline from two independent cohorts of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and age-matched controls. In the first cohort, 41% of the 117 MCI cases converted to AD during a clinical follow-up period of 4-7 years. In the second cohort, 14% of the 110 MCI subjects developed AD during a clinical follow-up period of 2-4 years. None of the plasma Abeta isoforms differed between MCI patients that subsequently developed AD and healthy controls or stable MCI patients. The Cox proportional hazards model did not reveal any differences in the probability of progression from MCI to AD related to plasma Abeta levels. In contrast, low levels of Abeta(1-42) in CSF were strongly associated with increased risk of future AD. The absence of a change in plasma Abeta in incipient AD, despite the marked change in CSF, may be explained by the lack of a correlation between the levels of Abeta(1-42) in CSF and plasma. In conclusion, the results show that CSF biomarkers are better predictors of progression to AD than plasma Abeta isoforms.Association between CSF biomarkers and incipient Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment: a follow-up study.Disease-modifying treatment strategies for Alzheimer's disease have led to an urgent need for biomarkers to identify the disease at a very early stage. Here, we assess the association between CSF biomarkers and incipient Alzheimer's in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).From a series of 180 consecutive patients with MCI, we assessed 137 who underwent successful lumbar puncture at baseline. Patients at risk of developing dementia were followed clinically for 4-6 years. Additionally, 39 healthy individuals, cognitively stable over 3 years, served as controls. We analysed CSF concentrations of beta amyloid(1-42) (Abeta42), total tau (T-tau), and phosphorylated tau (P-tau181) using Luminex xMAP technology.During follow-up, 57 (42%) patients with MCI developed Alzheimer's disease, 21 (15%) developed other forms of dementia, and 56 (41%) remained cognitively stable for 5.2 years (range 4.0-6.8). A combination of CSF T-tau and Abeta42 at baseline yielded a sensitivity of 95% and a specificity of 83% for detection of incipient AD in patients with MCI. The relative risk of progression to Alzheimer's disease was substantially increased in patients with MCI who had pathological concentrations of T-tau and Abeta42 at baseline (hazard ratio 17.7, p<0.0001). The association between pathological CSF and progression to Alzheimer's disease was much stronger than, and independent of, established risk factors including age, sex, education, APOE genotype, and plasma homocysteine. The combination of T-tau and Abeta42/P-tau181 ratio yielded closely similar results (sensitivity 95%, specificity 87%, hazard ratio 19.8).Concentrations of T-tau, P-tau181, and Abeta42 in CSF are strongly associated with future development of Alzheimer's disease in patients with MCI.Cerebrospinal fluid tau and beta-amyloid 42 proteins identify Alzheimer disease in subjects with mild cognitive impairment.Cerebrospinal fluid tau protein and beta-amyloid 42 (Abeta42) protein are altered even in very mild Alzheimer disease (AD). So far, few data exist for subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).To investigate the potential of cerebrospinal fluid tau and Abeta42 for predicting progression from MCI to AD in a longitudinal study of 28 patients with MCI who received follow-up for 18 months.An 18-month prospective study.Clinical follow-up study of community-residing subjects with MCI.Cerebrospinal fluid tau and Abeta42 concentrations were measured using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay at baseline. The potential of both biomarkers was evaluated to predict the progression to dementia, the end point of this study, using multiple logistic regression analysis.Of 28 subjects with MCI, 12 progressed to dementia (2 to frontotemporal dementia; 10 to AD). Six subjects had progressive MCI, and 10 subjects showed stable MCI. Cerebrospinal fluid tau levels were significantly elevated in patients who progressed to probable AD (P =.002) and subjects with progressive MCI (P =.003) compared with subjects who had stable MCI. Cerebrospinal fluid Abeta42 levels were significantly lower in patients who progressed to probable AD (P =.007) and those with progressive MCI (P =.04) than in subjects with stable MCI. Logistic regression analysis identified elevated tau protein level as a predictor of cognitive deterioration (P =.02), whereas a delayed verbal recall score at baseline was significantly associated with the development of probable AD (P =.03).Our results indicate that altered tau and Abeta42 concentrations may be detectable in subjects who are clinically diagnosed as having MCI but demonstrate the pathological changes of AD.Cube copying test in combination with rCBF or CSF A beta 42 predicts development of Alzheimer's disease.The aim was to identify subjects with incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD) among patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) using brief cognitive tests.A total of 147 MCI patients were followed for 4-6 years and the incidence of AD was 11.6%/year. At baseline, the cube copying test, clock drawing test, MMSE and measurements of regional cerebral blood flow (rCBF) and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (A beta (42)) were performed.The cube copying test, but not the clock drawing test, could predict AD among MCI patients with an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of 0.64 (p < 0.01). The relative risk for future AD was increased in MCI subjects with impaired cube copying test (sex- and age-adjusted hazard ratio = 1.8, p < 0.05) and the incidence of AD was 18.2% in this subgroup. Combining the cube copying test with either rCBF or CSF A beta(42) had additive effects on the risk assessment for future development of AD. MCI patients achieving high scores on both MMSE and cube copying test had a very low risk of developing AD (incidence of AD = 1.6%).In conclusion, combinations of the cube copying test with MMSE, rCBF and CSF A beta (42) measurements can identify subgroups of MCI subjects with either substantially reduced or increased risk for future development of AD.Age and diagnostic performance of Alzheimer disease CSF biomarkers.Core CSF changes in Alzheimer disease (AD) are decreased amyloid β(1-42), increased total tau, and increased phospho-tau, probably indicating amyloid plaque accumulation, axonal degeneration, and tangle pathology, respectively. These biomarkers identify AD already at the predementia stage, but their diagnostic performance might be affected by age-dependent increase of AD-type brain pathology in cognitively unaffected elderly.We investigated effects of age on the diagnostic performance of CSF biomarkers in a uniquely large multicenter study population, including a cross-sectional cohort of 529 patients with AD dementia (median age 71, range 43-89 years) and 304 controls (67, 44-91 years), and a longitudinal cohort of 750 subjects without dementia with mild cognitive impairment (69, 43-89 years) followed for at least 2 years, or until dementia diagnosis.The specificities for subjects without AD and the areas under the receiver operating characteristics curves decreased with age. However, the positive predictive value for a combination of biomarkers remained stable, while the negative predictive value decreased only slightly in old subjects, as an effect of the high AD prevalence in older ages.Although the diagnostic accuracies for AD decreased with age, the predictive values for a combination of biomarkers remained essentially stable. The findings highlight biomarker variability across ages, but support the use of CSF biomarkers for AD even in older populations.CSF biomarkers and incipient Alzheimer disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Small single-center studies have shown that cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers may be useful to identify incipient Alzheimer disease (AD) in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), but large-scale multicenter studies have not been conducted.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of CSF beta-amyloid(1-42) (Abeta42), total tau protein (T-tau), and tau phosphorylated at position threonine 181 (P-tau) for predicting incipient AD in patients with MCI.The study had 2 parts: a cross-sectional study involving patients with AD and controls to identify cut points, followed by a prospective cohort study involving patients with MCI, conducted 1990-2007. A total of 750 individuals with MCI, 529 with AD, and 304 controls were recruited by 12 centers in Europe and the United States. Individuals with MCI were followed up for at least 2 years or until symptoms had progressed to clinical dementia.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) of CSF Abeta42, T-tau, and P-tau for identifying incipient AD.During follow-up, 271 participants with MCI were diagnosed with AD and 59 with other dementias. The Abeta42 assay in particular had considerable intersite variability. Patients who developed AD had lower median Abeta42 (356; range, 96-1075 ng/L) and higher P-tau (81; range, 15-183 ng/L) and T-tau (582; range, 83-2174 ng/L) levels than MCI patients who did not develop AD during follow-up (579; range, 121-1420 ng/L for Abeta42; 53; range, 15-163 ng/L for P-tau; and 294; range, 31-2483 ng/L for T-tau, P < .001). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve was 0.78 (95% confidence interval [CI], 0.75-0.82) for Abeta42, 0.76 (95% CI, 0.72-0.80) for P-tau, and 0.79 (95% CI, 0.76-0.83) for T-tau. Cut-offs with sensitivity set to 85% were defined in the AD and control groups and tested in the MCI group, where the combination of Abeta42/P-tau ratio and T-tau identified incipient AD with a sensitivity of 83% (95% CI, 78%-88%), specificity 72% (95% CI, 68%-76%), positive LR, 3.0 (95% CI, 2.5-3.4), and negative LR, 0.24 (95% CI, 0.21-0.28). The positive predictive value was 62% and the negative predictive value was 88%.This multicenter study found that CSF Abeta42, T-tau, and P-tau identify incipient AD with good accuracy, but less accurately than reported from single-center studies. Intersite assay variability highlights a need for standardization of analytical techniques and clinical procedures.Serial MRI and CSF biomarkers in normal aging, MCI, and AD.To compare the annual change in MRI and CSF biomarkers in cognitively normal (CN), amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI), and Alzheimer disease (AD). Comparisons were based on intergroup discrimination, correlation with concurrent cognitive/functional changes, relationships to APOE genotype, and sample sizes for clinical trials.We used data from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative study consisting of CN, aMCI, and AD cohorts with both baseline and 12-month follow-up CSF and MRI. The annual change in CSF (total-tau [t-tau], Abeta(1-42)) and MRI (change in ventricular volume) was obtained in 312 subjects (92 CN, 149 aMCI, 71 AD).There was no significant average annual change in either CSF biomarker in any clinical group except t-tau in CN; moreover, the annual change did not differ by clinical group in pairwise comparisons. In contrast, annual increase in ventricular volume increased in the following order, AD > aMCI > CN, and differences were significant between all clinical groups in pairwise comparisons. Ventricular volume increase correlated with concurrent worsening on cognitive/functional indices in aMCI and AD whereas evidence of a similar correlation with change in CSF measures was unclear. The annual changes in MRI differed by APOE epsilon4 status overall and among aMCI while annual changes in CSF biomarkers did not. Estimated sample sizes for clinical trials are notably less for MRI than the CSF or clinical measures.Unlike the CSF biomarkers evaluated, changes in serial structural MRI are correlated with concurrent change on general cognitive and functional indices in impaired subjects, track with clinical disease stage, and are influenced by APOE genotype.Cerebrospinal fluid markers for prediction of Alzheimer's disease.A major diagnostic challenge when people seek advice for cognitive dysfunction is to differentiate between mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD). We show that a combination of three cerebrospinal fluid biochemical markers, total-tau, phospho-tau and beta-amyloid(1-42), can detect incipient AD among patients fulfilling the criteria for MCI with a sensitivity of 68% (95% CI 45-86%) and a specificity of 97% (95% CI 83-100%). The usefulness of these markers is further emphasized by the finding of a positive predictive value of 94% and a negative predictive value of 81%.Prediction of Alzheimer's disease using the CSF Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Evidence supports an important role for beta-amyloid (Abeta) in the pathogenesis of Alzheimer's disease (AD). Here, we investigate baseline levels of the 40- and 42-amino-acid-long Abeta peptides (Abeta40 and Abeta42) in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) from a cohort of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI, n = 137) in relation to the final diagnosis after 4-6 years of follow-up time. CSF Abeta42 concentration at baseline and the Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio were significantly decreased in the MCI patients who developed AD as compared to cognitively stable MCI patients and MCI patients who developed other forms of dementia (p < 0.001). The baseline levels of Abeta40 were similar in all MCI groups but correlated with change in Mini Mental State Examination scores in converters to AD. The Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio was superior to Abeta42 concentration with regard to identifying incipient AD in MCI (p < 0.05). In conclusion, the data provide further support for the view that amyloid precursor protein metabolism is disturbed in early sporadic AD and points to the usefulness of the Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio as a predictive biomarker for AD.Subcortical vascular dementia biomarker pattern in mild cognitive impairment.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) is an etiologically unclear disorder. Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers are potentially useful for the differentiation between various MCI etiologies.The aim of the study was to assess whether baseline CSF hyperphosphorylated tau (P-tau), total tau (T-tau), amyloid beta 1-42 (Abeta(42)) and neurofilament light (NF-L) in patients with MCI could predict subcortical vascular dementia (SVD) and Alzheimer's disease (AD) at follow-up.Biomarker levels were assessed by Luminex xMAP technology and ELISA.Increased baseline concentrations of NF-L significantly separated MCI-SVD from stable MCI. The MCI-SVD patients were inseparable from stable MCI but separable from patients developing AD (MCI-AD) on the basis of Abeta(42,) T-tau and P-tau(181) levels.A combination of the biomarkers Abeta(42), T-tau, P-tau(181) and NF-L has the potential to improve the clinical separation of MCI-SVD patients from stable MCI and MCI-AD patients.Combination of P300 and CSF β-amyloid(1-42) assays may provide a potential tool in the early diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease.The aim of this study was to investigate the diagnostic role of CSF beta amyloid(1-42) levels and auditory event-related potentials (AERPs) in the progression of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD).In fifty three MCI patients a lumbar puncture was performed and beta amyloid(1-42) levels were determined. Twenty patients were re-examined after 11 months. During this period five of them progressed to AD. Neuropsychological and ERP examinations were performed in all patients at both exams.Compared to MCI stable patients, AD-converters showed significantly lower beta-amyloid(1-42) values both for group 1 (Mann Whitney test, Z=-2.952, p=0.003, effect size r=-0.41) and group 2 (Z=-2.458, p=0.011; effect size r=-0.55). On the other hand, the patients of group 1 who converted to AD had prolonged latencies and lower amplitudes of the P300 wave compared to those of the MCI-stable patients, although the differences were not significant.Compared to the separate use of CSF beta-amyloid(1-42) and AERPs, higher values of sensitivity and specificity were achieved by the combined use of beta-amyloid(1-42) levels and P300 latencies (80% and 98%) or amplitudes (100% and 89%) in the discrimination between AD converters and MCI stable patients. Therefore the combination of an electrophysiological and a biological marker is potentially of high diagnostic value for the early diagnosis of AD converters.Cerebrospinal fluid profiles and prospective course and outcome in patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment.To examine the effect of specific cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) profiles on the rate of cognitive decline, disease progression, and risk of conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) dementia in patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (MCI).Total tau (T-tau), tau phosphorylated at threonine 181, and β-amyloid 1-42 peptide (Aβ42) were immunoassayed in CSF samples obtained from patients with MCI enrolled in the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative. Patients were then stratified by CSF profiles: (1) normal T-tau and normal Aβ42 (ie, normal-T-tauAβ42), (2) normal T-tau but abnormal Aβ42 (ie, abnormal-Aβ42), (3) abnormal T-tau but normal Aβ42 (ie, abnormal-T-tau), and (4) abnormal T-tau and abnormal Aβ42 (ie, abnormal-T-tauAβ42).Fifty-eight sites in the United States and Canada.One hundred ninety-five patients with MCI.A composite cognitive measure, the Clinical Dementia Rating Scale-sum of boxes subscale, and conversion to AD dementia.Patients with MCI with a CSF profile of abnormal-Aβ42 or abnormal-T-tauAβ42 experienced a faster rate of decline on the composite cognitive measure and the Clinical Dementia Rating Scale-sum of boxes subscale compared with those with normal-T-tauAβ42. They also had a greater risk of converting to AD dementia relative to the normal-T-tauAβ42 group. In contrast, those with a CSF profile of abnormal-T-tau did not differ from the normal-T-tauAβ42 group on any outcome. These findings were generally replicated when the sample was reclassified by patterns of tau phosphorylated at threonine 181 and Aβ42 abnormalities.β-Amyloid abnormalities but not tau alterations are associated with cognitive deterioration, disease progression, and increased risk of conversion to AD dementia in patients with MCI. Patients with abnormal Aβ42 may be prime candidates for drug treatment and clinical trials in MCI.Cerebrospinal fluid biomarker signature in Alzheimer's disease neuroimaging initiative subjects.Develop a cerebrospinal fluid biomarker signature for mild Alzheimer's disease (AD) in Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI) subjects.Amyloid-beta 1 to 42 peptide (A beta(1-42)), total tau (t-tau), and tau phosphorylated at the threonine 181 were measured in (1) cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) samples obtained during baseline evaluation of 100 mild AD, 196 mild cognitive impairment, and 114 elderly cognitively normal (NC) subjects in ADNI; and (2) independent 56 autopsy-confirmed AD cases and 52 age-matched elderly NCs using a multiplex immunoassay. Detection of an AD CSF profile for t-tau and A beta(1-42) in ADNI subjects was achieved using receiver operating characteristic cut points and logistic regression models derived from the autopsy-confirmed CSF data.CSF A beta(1-42) was the most sensitive biomarker for AD in the autopsy cohort of CSF samples: receiver operating characteristic area under the curve of 0.913 and sensitivity for AD detection of 96.4%. In the ADNI cohort, a logistic regression model for A beta(1-42), t-tau, and APO epsilon 4 allele count provided the best assessment delineation of mild AD. An AD-like baseline CSF profile for t-tau/A beta(1-42) was detected in 33 of 37 ADNI mild cognitive impairment subjects who converted to probable AD during the first year of the study.The CSF biomarker signature of AD defined by A beta(1-42) and t-tau in the autopsy-confirmed AD cohort and confirmed in the cohort followed in ADNI for 12 months detects mild AD in a large, multisite, prospective clinical investigation, and this signature appears to predict conversion from mild cognitive impairment to AD.Longitudinal cerebrospinal fluid biomarkers over four years in mild cognitive impairment.Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) measurements of amyloid-β42 (Aβ42), total-tau (T-tau), and phosphorylated tau (P-tau) may be used to predict future Alzheimer's disease (AD) dementia in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). The precise temporal development of these biomarkers in relation to clinical progression is unclear. Earlier studies have been hampered by short follow-up. In an MCI cohort, we selected 15 patients who developed AD (MCI-AD) and 15 who remained cognitively stable during 4 years of follow-up. CSF was sampled at three serial occasions from each patient and analyzed for Aβ peptides, the soluble amyloid-β protein precursor protein fragments sAβPPα and sAβPPβ, T-tau, P-tau, and chromogranin B, which is a protein linked to regulated neuronal secretion. We also measured, for the first time in MCI patients, an extended panel of Aβ peptides by matrix-assisted-laser-desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (MS). Most biomarkers were surprisingly stable over the four years with coefficients of variation below or close to 10%. However, MCI-AD patients decreased in CSF AβX₋₄₀ and chromogranin B concentrations, which may indicate a reduced number of functional neurons or synapses with disease progression. The MS Aβ peptide panel was more useful than any single Aβ peptide to identify MCI-AD patients already at baseline. Knowledge on these biomarkers and their trajectories may facilitate early diagnosis of AD and be useful in future clinical trials to track effects of disease modifying drugs.Plasma Abeta42 and Abeta40 as markers of cognitive change in follow-up: a prospective, longitudinal, population-based cohort study.Single measurements of plasma Aβ are not useful in the diagnostics of Alzheimer's disease (AD). However, changes in plasma Aβ levels during repeated testing may be helpful in the prediction and evaluation of progression of the incipient AD or mild cognitive impairment.To examine the relation of baseline and serial plasma Aβ levels to cognitive change in follow-up.269 subjects (52 cognitively impaired and 217 controls) from a population-based cohort were clinically followed up from 3 to 6 years. Serial plasma samples were available from 70 subjects who were followed up for 3 years and 43 subjects followed for 6 years. The plasma Aβ levels were measured using ELISA.Subjects who declined cognitively during the follow-up had lower levels of plasma Aβ42 at the baseline. Plasma Aβ42 and the Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio decreased (-2.4 pg/ml for Aβ42 in 6 years) in those who declined in follow-up, whereas Aβ42 and the Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio increased in the subjects who remained cognitively stable or improved in follow-up. Subjects using acetylsalicylic acid, dipyridamole, antidiabetic or anticoagulant drugs as well as subjects with coronary heart disease had higher levels of Aβ40.Low or decreasing plasma Aβ42 during the follow-up is associated with cognitive decline. Serial measurement of plasma Aβ42 may be useful in the detection of the subjects who are at risk for cognitive decline.Longitudinal changes of CSF biomarkers in Alzheimer's disease.Longitudinal changes of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers in Alzheimer's disease (AD) have been studied, but there are few consistent conclusions and even less is known about their variation during the different stages of the disease. We hypothesized that changes in CSF biomarker values would correlate with the progression of the cognitive decline in AD. One hundred and thirty-one memory clinic patients [56 AD, 57 mild cognitive impairment (MCI), 10 other neurological disorders, eight unimpaired subjects] underwent a clinical follow-up with repeated Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) tests and two lumbar punctures with a median interval of 3 years. Levels of CSF amyloid-β (Aβ)(42), tau, and p-tau-181 were measured using commercially available ELISA. Twenty-one of the MCI subjects progressed to AD, whereas 26 subjects remained stable and 56 subjects had AD already at the baseline. The subjects displaying the most rapid MMSE decline rate had the lowest baseline Aβ(42), highest tau, and highest p-tau-181 CSF concentrations. An annual decrease of 2.20 pg/ml/year in the CSF p-tau-181 concentration was seen in AD-AD patients (p = 0.001). The difference was significant compared to stable MCI-MCI (increase of 1.24 pg/ml/year, p = 0.001) and cognitively healthy (increase of 0.84 pg/ml/year, p = 0.013) subjects (p for group difference 0.004). The decrease rate of p-tau-181 correlated with the MMSE decrease rate in AD subjects (r = 0.579, p < 0.001). The CSF Aβ(42) level decreased in the AD-AD group (decrease 11.9 pg/ml/year, p < 0.001). Concentrations of hyperphosphorylated tau decline in the late stages of the AD process. The decrease of p-tau-181 appears to correlate with cognitive functioning and probably reflects neuronal loss. More longitudinal studies of CSF biomarker dynamics are needed, especially in patients during the preclinical stage of the disease.Biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease in the cerebrospinal fluid of Spanish patients with mild cognitive impairment.The study of biomarkers in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) is a technique used with increasing frequency in the early diagnosis of Alzheimers disease (AD). Our objectiv was to gain an own experience while evaluating the reliability, sensitivity, and reproducibility of this technique in Spanish patients. Thirty-seven patients with MCI and twenty-four control subjects were studied by means of AD biomarker analysis in CSF. xMAP Luminex and INNO-BIA Alzbio3 reagents of Innogenetics were used. The study variables assessed were levels of Aβ(1-42), T-tau and P-tau(181p) proteins as well as the ratios of T-tau/Aβ(1-42) and P-tau(181p)/Aβ(1-42). Samples from nineteen patients were examined twice. Intra-class correlation coefficients for the three biomarkers used showed values higher than 0.95. We observed significant differences between the control group and the MCI groups. In the 6 months following lumbar puncture (LP), eleven (29%) patients with MCI developed AD. These patients showed significant lower levels in Aβ(1-42) protein (276.35 ± 78 vs. 367.13 ± 123.49, P < 0.03) and higher ratios (T-tau/Aβ(1-42) [0.38 ± 0.2 vs. 0.22 ± 0.14, P < 0.01] and P-tau(181p)/Aβ(1-42) [0.27 ± 0.13 vs. 0.16 ± 0.1, P < 0.008]) to those in the same group who remained stable. We obtained similar results to those in the most recent reliable literature with our ROC curves, especially with our P-tau(181p) values and T-tau/Aβ(1-42) ratio in order to differentiate between control and AD groups. Our experience showed that the analysis of CSF-AD biomarkers in patients with MCI is reliable, sensitive and reproducible. In our knowledge, this is the first experience in Spanish patients.Value of CSF beta-amyloid1-42 and tau as predictors of Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) are at a high risk of developing clinical Alzheimer's disease (AD). We asked to what extent the core biomarker candidates cerebro-spinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (Abeta(1-42)) and CSF tau protein concentrations predict conversion from MCI to AD. We studied 52 patients with MCI, 93 AD patients, and 10 healthy controls (HC). The MCI group was composed of 29 patients who had converted to AD during follow-up, and of 23 patients who showed no cognitive decline. CSF Abeta(1-42) and tau protein levels were assessed at baseline in all subjects, using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. For assessment of sensitivity and specificity, we used independently established reference values for CSF Abeta(1-42) and CSF tau. The levels of CSF tau were increased, whereas levels of Abeta(1-42) were decreased in MCI subjects. Abeta(1-42) predicted AD in converted MCI with a sensitivity of 59% and a specificity of 100% compared to HC. Tau yielded a greater sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 90%. In a multiple Cox regression analysis within the MCI group, low baseline levels of Abeta(1-42), but not other predictor variables (tau protein, gender, age, apolipoprotein E epsilon4 carrier status, Mini Mental Status Examination score, observation time, antidementia therapy), correlated with conversion status (P<0.05). Our findings support the notion that CSF tau and Abeta(1-42) may be useful biomarkers in the early identification of AD in MCI subjects.Cerebrospinal fluid levels of β-amyloid 1-42, but not of tau, are fully changed already 5 to 10 years before the onset of Alzheimer dementia.Early detection of prodromal Alzheimer disease (AD) is important because new disease-modifying therapies are most likely to be effective when initiated during the early stages of disease.To assess the ability of the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers total tau (T-tau), phosphorylated tau (P-tau), and β-amyloid 1-42 (Aβ42) to predict future development of AD dementia within 9.2 years in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and to compare CSF biomarkers between early and late converters to AD.A clinical study with a median follow-up of 9.2 years (range, 4.1-11.8 years).Memory disorder clinic. Patients A total of 137 patients with MCI who underwent lumbar puncture at baseline. MAIN OUTCOME MEASURE Conversion to AD dementia.During follow-up, 72 patients (53.7%) developed AD and 21 (15.7%) progressed to other forms of dementia. At baseline, CSF Aβ42 levels were reduced and T-tau and P-tau levels were elevated in patients who converted to AD during follow-up compared with nonconverters (P < .001). Baseline CSF Aβ42 levels were equally reduced in patients with MCI who converted to AD within 0 to 5 years (early converters) compared with those who converted between 5 and 10 years (late converters). However, CSF T-tau and P-tau levels were significantly higher in early converters vs late converters. A baseline Aβ42:P-tau ratio predicted the development of AD within 9.2 years with a sensitivity of 88%, specificity of 90%, positive predictive value of 91%, and negative predictive value of 86%.Approximately 90% of patients with MCI and pathologic CSF biomarker levels at baseline develop AD within 9 to 10 years. Levels of Aβ42 are already fully decreased at least 5 to 10 years before conversion to AD dementia, whereas T-tau and P-tau seem to be later markers. These results provide direct support in humans for the hypothesis that altered Aβ metabolism precedes tau-related pathology and neuronal degeneration.Diagnosis-independent Alzheimer disease biomarker signature in cognitively normal elderly people.To identify biomarker patterns typical for Alzheimer disease (AD) in an independent, unsupervised way, without using information on the clinical diagnosis.Mixture modeling approach.Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative database.Cognitively normal persons, patients with AD, and individuals with mild cognitive impairment.Cerebrospinal fluid-derived beta-amyloid protein 1-42, total tau protein, and phosphorylated tau(181P) protein concentrations were used as biomarkers on a clinically well-characterized data set. The outcome of the qualification analysis was validated on 2 additional data sets, 1 of which was autopsy confirmed.Using the US Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative data set, a cerebrospinal fluid beta-amyloid protein 1-42/phosphorylated tau(181P) biomarker mixture model identified 1 feature linked to AD, while the other matched the "healthy" status. The AD signature was found in 90%, 72%, and 36% of patients in the AD, mild cognitive impairment, and cognitively normal groups, respectively. The cognitively normal group with the AD signature was enriched in apolipoprotein E epsilon4 allele carriers. Results were validated on 2 other data sets. In 1 study consisting of 68 autopsy-confirmed AD cases, 64 of 68 patients (94% sensitivity) were correctly classified with the AD feature. In another data set with patients (n = 57) with mild cognitive impairment followed up for 5 years, the model showed a sensitivity of 100% in patients progressing to AD.The mixture modeling approach, totally independent of clinical AD diagnosis, correctly classified patients with AD. The unexpected presence of the AD signature in more than one-third of cognitively normal subjects suggests that AD pathology is active and detectable earlier than has heretofore been envisioned.Diagnosing prodromal Alzheimer's disease: role of CSF biochemical markers.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) is an aetiologically heterogeneous syndrome. A correct prediction of MCI conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD) represents a primary goal in routine clinical practice. Since the presence of pathological levels in >or=2 cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers; amyloid protein (Abeta42), total tau (h-tau) and phospho-tau (p-tau) seems to reliably identifying MCI subjects converting to AD, we report our experience in a routine clinical setting. In the period from January 2001 to June 2003, 273 consecutive patients referred to our Memory Clinic for diagnostic assessment of cognitive impairment. Of them, 180 underwent a complete diagnostic evaluation including CSF dosage of fragment 1-42 of amyloid protein, total tau and phospho-tau (ELISA Method, Innogenetics, Gent, Belgium), after vascular or other secondary causes of dementia could be excluded. At baseline, 38% of the MCI subjects (20/55) showed pathological levels in >or=2 CSF biomarkers. After 1 year, 11 MCI patients converted to dementia, 33 remained stable, 11 showed a further progression of cognitive impairment still not fulfilling the diagnostic criteria for dementia. Of the 11 converters, 10 showed >or=2 pathological values CSF biomarkers and in all of them, p-tau was high. On the contrary, 29 out of 33 stable MCI (88%) showed no or one pathological CSF value. We confirm that pathological levels in >or=2 CSF biomarkers reliably predict MCI conversion to AD and correctly identify the stable form of MCI.[The role of CSF markers in the early diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease].Biomarkers in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) are being used increasingly to diagnose early Alzheimer's disease (AD). A CSF profile that is suggestive of ad is an abnormal ratio of the proteins Ab1-42 to total tau.To describe the prevalence and prognosis of a CSF profile in patients without dementia but with subjective memory problems and mild cognitive impairments (MCI) at a memory clinic.A multi-centre study.A European multi-centre study showed that a CSF AD profile was often present in patients with subjective complaints and patients with MCI . The CSF AD profile predicted a decline in cognition and daily functioning over a period of 3 years in patients with MCI. Patients with amnestic MCI and a CSF AD profile developed AD more often within this period than patients without this profile.CSF markers suggestive of ad are common in persons without dementia. It may be possible to use these markers for the prognosis of patients who have MCI .Mapping correlations between ventricular expansion and CSF amyloid and tau biomarkers in 240 subjects with Alzheimer's disease, mild cognitive impairment and elderly controls.We aimed to improve on the single-atlas ventricular segmentation method of (Carmichael, O.T., Thompson, P.M., Dutton, R.A., Lu, A., Lee, S.E., Lee, J.Y., Kuller, L.H., Lopez, O.L., Aizenstein, H.J., Meltzer, C.C., Liu, Y., Toga, A.W., Becker, J.T., 2006. Mapping ventricular changes related to dementia and mild cognitive impairment in a large community-based cohort. IEEE ISBI. 315-318) by using multi-atlas segmentation, which has been shown to lead to more accurate segmentations (Chou, Y., Leporé, N., de Zubicaray, G., Carmichael, O., Becker, J., Toga, A., Thompson, P., 2008. Automated ventricular mapping with multi-atlas fluid image alignment reveals genetic effects in Alzheimer's disease, NeuroImage 40(2): 615-630); with this method, we calculated minimal numbers of subjects needed to detect correlations between clinical scores and ventricular maps. We also assessed correlations between emerging CSF biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease pathology and localizable deficits in the brain, in 80 AD, 80 mild cognitive impairment (MCI), and 80 healthy controls from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative. Six expertly segmented images and their embedded parametric mesh surfaces were fluidly registered to each brain; segmentations were averaged within subjects to reduce errors. Surface-based statistical maps revealed powerful correlations between surface morphology and 4 variables: (1) diagnosis, (2) depression severity, (3) cognitive function at baseline, and (4) future cognitive decline over the following year. Cognitive function was assessed using the mini-mental state exam (MMSE), global and sum-of-boxes clinical dementia rating (CDR) scores, at baseline and 1-year follow-up. Lower CSF Abeta(1-42) protein levels, a biomarker of AD pathology assessed in 138 of the 240 subjects, were correlated with lateral ventricular expansion. Using false discovery rate (FDR) methods, 40 and 120 subjects, respectively, were needed to discriminate AD and MCI from normal groups. 120 subjects were required to detect correlations between ventricular enlargement and MMSE, global CDR, sum-of-boxes CDR and clinical depression scores. Ventricular expansion maps correlate with pathological and cognitive measures in AD, and may be useful in future imaging-based clinical trials.CSF soluble amyloid precursor proteins in the diagnosis of incipient Alzheimer disease.To explore if soluble amyloid precursor proteins (sAPP) in CSF improve the identification of patients with incipient Alzheimer disease (AD) in a group of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).A cohort study with follow-up assessments of 58 patients with MCI with baseline CSF sampling was conducted: 21 patients had progressed to probable AD (MCI-AD), 27 still had MCI, 8 had reverted to normal (MCI-NAD), and 2 patients with frontotemporal dementia (FTD) were excluded. Sixteen additional patients with FTD were included to explore the specificity of the CSF markers. CSF concentrations of sAPPα, sAPPβ, tau, and Aβ(1-42) were measured with sensitive and specific ELISAs. Associations between diagnostic status, CSF protein concentrations, and other patient characteristics were explored using multiple logistic regression analyses with stepwise variable selection. The optimal sensitivity and specificity of the best models were derived from receiver operating characteristic curves.The MCI-AD group had significantly higher sAPPβ concentrations than the MCI-NAD and the FTD groups. A combination of sAPPβ, tau, and age differentiated the MCI-AD and the MCI-NAD groups with a sensitivity of 80.00% and a specificity of 81.00%. The best model for the differentiation of the MCI-AD and the FTD groups included sAPPβ and tau, and showed a sensitivity of 95.20% and a specificity of 81.20%. Aβ(1-42) and sAPPα did not significantly contribute to the models.These findings suggest that sAPPβ may be clinically useful, and superior to Aβ(1-42), in the early and differential diagnosis of incipient AD.Brain beta-amyloid measures and magnetic resonance imaging atrophy both predict time-to-progression from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease.Biomarkers of brain Aβ amyloid deposition can be measured either by cerebrospinal fluid Aβ42 or Pittsburgh compound B positron emission tomography imaging. Our objective was to evaluate the ability of Aβ load and neurodegenerative atrophy on magnetic resonance imaging to predict shorter time-to-progression from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's dementia and to characterize the effect of these biomarkers on the risk of progression as they become increasingly abnormal. A total of 218 subjects with mild cognitive impairment were identified from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative. The primary outcome was time-to-progression to Alzheimer's dementia. Hippocampal volumes were measured and adjusted for intracranial volume. We used a new method of pooling cerebrospinal fluid Aβ42 and Pittsburgh compound B positron emission tomography measures to produce equivalent measures of brain Aβ load from either source and analysed the results using multiple imputation methods. We performed our analyses in two phases. First, we grouped our subjects into those who were 'amyloid positive' (n = 165, with the assumption that Alzheimer's pathology is dominant in this group) and those who were 'amyloid negative' (n = 53). In the second phase, we included all 218 subjects with mild cognitive impairment to evaluate the biomarkers in a sample that we assumed to contain a full spectrum of expected pathologies. In a Kaplan-Meier analysis, amyloid positive subjects with mild cognitive impairment were much more likely to progress to dementia within 2 years than amyloid negative subjects with mild cognitive impairment (50 versus 19%). Among amyloid positive subjects with mild cognitive impairment only, hippocampal atrophy predicted shorter time-to-progression (P < 0.001) while Aβ load did not (P = 0.44). In contrast, when all 218 subjects with mild cognitive impairment were combined (amyloid positive and negative), hippocampal atrophy and Aβ load predicted shorter time-to-progression with comparable power (hazard ratio for an inter-quartile difference of 2.6 for both); however, the risk profile was linear throughout the range of hippocampal atrophy values but reached a ceiling at higher values of brain Aβ load. Our results are consistent with a model of Alzheimer's disease in which Aβ deposition initiates the pathological cascade but is not the direct cause of cognitive impairment as evidenced by the fact that Aβ load severity is decoupled from risk of progression at high levels. In contrast, hippocampal atrophy indicates how far along the neurodegenerative path one is, and hence how close to progressing to dementia. Possible explanations for our finding that many subjects with mild cognitive impairment have intermediate levels of Aβ load include: (i) individual subjects may reach an Aβ load plateau at varying absolute levels; (ii) some subjects may be more biologically susceptible to Aβ than others; and (iii) subjects with mild cognitive impairment with intermediate levels of Aβ may represent individuals with Alzheimer's disease co-existent with other pathologies.Prediction of conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease dementia based upon biomarkers and neuropsychological test performance.The current study tested the accuracy of primary MRI and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarker candidates and neuropsychological tests for predicting the conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD) dementia. In a cross-validation paradigm, predictor models were estimated in the training set of AD (N = 81) and elderly control subjects (N = 101). A combination of CSF t-tau/Aβ(1-4) ratio and MRI biomarkers or neuropsychological tests (free recall and trail making test B (TMT-B)) showed the best statistical fit in the AD vs. HC comparison, reaching a classification accuracy of up to 64% when applied to the prediction of MCI conversion (3.3-year observation interval, mean = 2.3 years). However, several single-predictor models showed a predictive accuracy of MCI conversion comparable to that of any multipredictor model. The best single predictors were right entorhinal cortex (prediction accuracy = 68.5% (95% CI (59.5, 77.4))) and TMT-B test (prediction accuracy 64.6% (95% CI (55.5, 73.4%))). In conclusion, short-term conversion to AD is predicted by single marker models to a comparable degree as by multimarker models in amnestic MCI subjects.Progression of mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease: improved diagnostic value of the combined use of N200 latency and beta-amyloid(1-42) levels.The aim of this study was to investigate the role of cerebrospinal fluid beta-amyloid(1-42) levels and auditory event-related potentials (AERPs) in the progress of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD).In 53 MCI patients, lumbar puncture was performed and beta-amyloid(1-42) levels were determined. Twenty patients were reexamined after 11 months. During this period, 5 of them progressed to AD. Neuropsychological and ERP analyses were performed on all patients during both baseline and endpoint examinations.Compared to stable MCI patients, those that progressed to AD had significantly lower beta-amyloid(1-42) levels (Mann-Whitney test, Z = -2.952, p = 0.003; effect size r = -0.41) and significantly prolonged N200 latencies (Mann-Whitney test, Z = -3.561, p < 0.001, effect size r = -0.49). From ERP variables, only the N200 latency significantly correlated with beta-amyloid(1-42) levels (baseline examination: r(s) = -0.421, p = 0.002; follow-up examination: r(s) = -0.574, p = 0.008).The combined use of these two parameters enabled discrimination of stable MCI patients from those who developed AD, with 100% sensitivity and specificity. Therefore, this method could be of high diagnostic value for the early diagnosis of AD.CSF Abeta42, Tau and phosphorylated Tau, APOE epsilon4 allele and MCI type in progressive MCI.The patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) have an elevated risk for Alzheimer's disease (AD). Especially the amnestic MCI is seen as prodrome of AD. Apolipoprotein E (APOE) epsilon4 allele, abnormal CSF Abeta42, Tau and phosphorylated Tau (phospho-Tau) levels are associated with elevated risk for AD.APOE genotyping was done by PCR based method and baseline CSF Abeta42, Tau and phospho-Tau were measured by ELISA from 60 controls and 79 MCI patients.Thirty-three MCI patients developed dementia during an average of 3.5 years follow-up. CSF Abeta42 was decreased and Tau and phospho-Tau were increased in the progressive MCI patients. The APOE epsilon4 allele was more frequent in the progressive MCI patients. The APOE epsilon4 allele showed a dose dependent association o the Abeta42 levels in the progressive MCI patients and to all of the markers in controls.Decreased CSF Abeta42 and elevated Tau or phospho-Tau together with APOE epsilon4 allele are highly predictive for the dementia in MCI patients with amnestic or executive symptoms.The new Alzheimer's criteria in a naturalistic series of patients with mild cognitive impairment.To test the validity of the new diagnostic criteria for Alzheimer's disease (AD) in a naturalistic series of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Ninety consecutive MCI patients were enrolled in a longitudinal study on the natural history of cognitive impairment. Medial temporal (MT) atrophy on MRI was defined as hippocampal volume below the fifth percentile of the distribution in healthy elders, abnormal CSF was based on Sjogren's cutoffs for Abeta42 and tau, and temporoparietal hypometabolism on 18F-FDG PET based on Herholz's t sum score. Patients were followed clinically to detect conversion to AD (MCI-AD), non-AD dementia (MCI-nAD), or no conversion (MCI-NC). The 24 MCI-AD and 15 MCI-nAD patients had sociodemographic, clinical, and neuropsychological baseline features similar to the 51 MCI-NC patients. All MCI patients with MT atrophy converted to AD, as did all those with abnormal CSF, but only 48 and 35% of those without MT atrophy or abnormal CSF converted (p on logrank test = 0.0007 and 0.001). Prediction of AD conversion was enhanced when positivity to either MT atrophy or abnormal CSF was considered, with only 15% of those MCI patients negative on both converting to AD (p < 0.0005). Markers were not predictive of non-AD dementia conversion. The accuracy of either MT atrophy or abnormal CSF in discriminating MCI-AD from MCI-NC was good (AUC 0.82, 95% CI 0.70-0.95). MT atrophy and abnormal CSF are the single most robust predictors of conversion to AD in MCI patients, and their combination enhances prediction. AD markers are not predictive of conversion to non-AD dementia.Longitudinal change of biomarkers in cognitive decline.To delineate the trajectories of Aβ42 level in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), fludeoxyglucose F18 (FDG) uptake using positron emission tomography, and hippocampal volume using magnetic resonance imaging and their relative associations with cognitive change at different stages in aging and Alzheimer disease (AD).Cohort study.The 59 study sites for the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative.A total of 819 participants 55 to 90 years of age with normal cognition, mild cognitive impairment, and AD who were followed up during the period from 2005 to 2007.Rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF, FDG uptake, hippocampal volume, and the Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale score during up to 36 months of follow-up by diagnostic group as well as prediction of cognitive change by each biomarker.Reductions in the level of Aβ42 in CSF were numerically greater in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD; whereas both glucose metabolic decline and hippocampal atrophy were significantly slower in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD. Positive APOE4 status accelerated hippocampal atrophic changes in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD, but did not modify rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF or FDG uptake. The Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale scores were related only to the baseline level of Aβ42 in CSF and the baseline FDG uptake in participants with normal cognition, which were about equally associated with change in FDG uptake and hippocampal volume in participants with mild cognitive impairment and best modeled by change in FDG uptake in participants with AD.Trajectories of Aβ42 level in CSF, FDG uptake, and hippocampal volume vary across different cognitive stages. The longitudinal patterns support a hypothetical sequence of AD pathology in which amyloid deposition is an early event before hypometabolism or hippocampal atrophy, suggesting that biomarker prediction for cognitive change is stage dependent.The relationship of plasma Aβ levels to dementia in aging individuals with mild cognitive impairment.Amyloid β(Aβ) peptides are important components of plaques in Alzheimer's disease(AD). A decrease in the CSF concentration of Aβ40 and Aβ42 is a potential biomarker for incident AD. In contrast, studies on plasma Aβ40 and Aβ42 concentrations have yielded contradictory results. To explore the relationship between plasma Aβ40 and Aβ42 concentrations and AD in aging individuals with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), evaluate the sensitivity and the specificity of plasma Aβ and their ratio as a marker for progression to AD. We measured baseline concentrations of Aβ40 and Aβ42, and their ratio in plasma of patients carefully categorized clinically and neurochemically as having AD or other dementias from a cohort of patients with MCI (n=588) after 4-6 years of follow-up time. Plasma concentrations of Aβ40, Aβ42 were measured using a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay technology. The association between plasma Aβ concentrations and the risk of dementia was assessed using Cox proportional hazard models. Optimal sensitivity and specificity of Aβ measurements were determined by ROC curve analysis. Plasma Aβ42 concentration and the Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio at baseline were significantly decreased in the MCI patients who developed AD as compared to cognitively stable MCI patients. The baseline concentrations of Aβ40 were similar in all MCI groups. The Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio was superior to Aβ42 concentration with regard to identify incipient AD in MCI. The ratio of Aβ42 to Aβ40 rather than absolute levels of the peptides can aid in the identification of incipient AD among MCI patients. A potential role of plasma Aβ concentrations as a marker of incipient dementia warrants further investigation.Two-year outcome of MCI subtypes and aetiologies in the Göteborg MCI study.The objective was to study the 2-year outcome of subjects diagnosed as having mild cognitive impairment (MCI).Two hundred and nine subjects diagnosed as having MCI were examined with a comprehensive neuropsychological test battery and followed up after 2 years.After 2 years, 34 subjects (16%) were lost for follow-up. Those subjects did not differ significantly in terms of MCI subclassification, MMSE score or age and education. Of the 175 subjects followed up, eight (4.5%) had improved to normal, two with amnestic MCI, one from multiple domains MCI, three with single domain MCI and two without any significant impairment at baseline. Forty-four subjects (25%) had progressed to dementia. Of these, 35 were from the multidomain amnestic group and nine from the multidomain non-amnestic group. The combination of Alzheimer-typical biomarkers (total-tau and amyloid beta) and multidomain amnestic MCI was the strongest predictor of progression to Alzheimer's disease, while vascular disease and multidomain amnestic MCI preceded mixed and vascular dementia.The results suggest that memory impairment alone, or impairment in any one cognitive domain alone, is a rather benign condition. Impairment in several cognitive domains is associated with a more severe outcome over 2 years. Also, 20% of the subjects who progressed to dementia, including Alzheimer's disease, did not show memory impairment at baseline, which suggests that memory impairment is not always the first symptom of even the most common dementia disorders.Cognitive reserve in relation to abeta42 in patients converting from MCI to dementia - a follow-up report.The concept of the cognitive reserve (CR) hypothesizes that premorbid factors such as education enable compensation for the manifestation of brain pathology. Accordingly, pathology should be more prominent in individuals with higher CR before becoming clinically apparent. Previously, we found that patients subsequently converting to dementia with higher CR had lower concentrations of amyloid beta 42 (abeta42) as compared to patients with lower CR. However, the interaction between time, biomarkers, neuropsychological performance and CR is yet to be established.To study the relation between biomarkers, neuropsychological performance and CR longitudinally.A mixed between-within subject analysis of variance was performed for longitudinal analysis. Paired t tests were used for within group comparisons.Patients with higher CR (n = 15) had significantly lower concentrations of abeta42 at both time points compared to those with medium (n = 23) and lower CR (n = 28). Also, abeta42 concentrations decreased significantly from baseline to follow-up in patients with higher and medium CR. Groups performed comparably on neuropsychological tests.This study provides further support for the applicability of abeta42 as a substitute for pathology in relation to CR. Also, abeta42 reflects the disease progression in patients with higher and medium CR.Progression from MCI to AD: predictive value of CSF Aβ42 is modified by APOE genotype.To study CSF biomarkers amyloid-beta 1-42 (Aβ42) and total tau (tau) in relation to APOE genotype in their ability to predict progression from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD).In 100 MCI patients CSF Aβ42, tau and APOE genotype were determined. At follow-up of 18 (13-24) months 58 patients remained non-progressive and 42 progressed to AD.Cox proportional hazards models showed an interaction between Aβ42 and APOE genotype (p<0.05). Stratification for APOE revealed HR (95% CI) for abnormal Aβ42 of 8.2 (2.1-31.9) for ε4 non-carriers, 3.9 (0.8-18.5) for heterozygotes and 0.3 (0.0-1.7) for homozygotes. Inversely, stratification for Aβ42 revealed that in patients with normal levels of Aβ42, ε4 homozygotes had a strongly increased risk of progression to AD with HR (95% CI) 20.8 (2.4-182.8). Tau and APOE independently predicted progression to AD.Aβ42 was a stronger predictor of progression to AD in APOE ε4 non-carriers than in carriers. Furthermore, the risk of progression for ε4 homozygotes was very high, also in patients with normal levels of Aβ42.Predicting MCI outcome with clinically available MRI and CSF biomarkers.To determine the ability of clinically available volumetric MRI (vMRI) and CSF biomarkers, alone or in combination with a quantitative learning measure, to predict conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).We stratified 192 MCI participants into positive and negative risk groups on the basis of 1) degree of learning impairment on the Rey Auditory Verbal Learning Test; 2) medial temporal atrophy, quantified from Food and Drug Administration-approved software for automated vMRI analysis; and 3) CSF biomarker levels(.) We also stratified participants based on combinations of risk factors. We computed Cox proportional hazards models, controlling for age, to assess 3-year risk of converting to AD as a function of risk group and used Kaplan-Meier analyses to determine median survival times.When risk factors were examined separately, individuals testing positive showed significantly higher risk of converting to AD than individuals testing negative (hazard ratios [HR] 1.8-4.1). The joint presence of any 2 risk factors substantially increased risk, with the combination of greater learning impairment and increased atrophy associated with highest risk (HR 29.0): 85% of patients with both risk factors converted to AD within 3 years, vs 5% of those with neither. The presence of medial temporal atrophy was associated with shortest median dementia-free survival (15 months).Incorporating quantitative assessment of learning ability along with vMRI or CSF biomarkers in the clinical workup of MCI can provide critical information on risk of imminent conversion to AD.Progression from mild to pronounced MCI is not associated with cerebrospinal fluid biomarker deviations.Detection of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarker deviations improve prediction of progression from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to dementia. However, it is not settled whether the same pattern exists in patients progressing from very mild to more pronounced MCI. Given that neurodegenerative processes occur very early in the disease course, we also expected to find biomarker deviations in these patients.A total of 246 memory clinic patients with non-progressive (n = 161), progressive (n = 19), or converting (n = 66) MCI, 67 with stable dementia, and 80 controls were followed for 24 months. At baseline, CSF total tau (T-tau), β-amyloid 1-42 (Aβ42) and the light subunit of neurofilament protein (NFL) were determined.Patients with converting MCI and stable dementia had lower CSF Aβ42 concentrations and higher T-tau concentrations and NFL in comparison with controls and non-progressive/progressive MCI (p < 0.0005). No differences were found between progressive and non-progressive MCI.As expected, biomarker deviations predicted progression from MCI to dementia. Contrary to our hypothesis, progression from very mild MCI to more pronounced MCI was not reflected by biomarker deviations. The results suggest that the measured biomarkers are not early disease markers, or alternatively Alzheimer or vascular pathology is not the underlying cause in this patient group.Plasma amyloid levels and the risk of AD in normal subjects in the Cardiovascular Health Study.To examine the association between incident Alzheimer disease (AD), and plasma A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels in normal and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) subjects in a subgroup of participants of the Cardiovascular Health Study Cognition Study.We determined the plasma A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels of 274 nondemented subjects (232 normals and 42 with MCI) in 1998-1999 and repeated the measurements in 2002-2003. The mean age of the subjects at baseline was 79.3 +/- 3.6 years. We examined the association between A beta levels and incident AD over the ensuing 4.5 years, controlling for age, cystatin C level (marker of glomerular function), apolipoprotein E-4 allele, Modified-Mini-Mental State Examination scores, and MRI-identified infarcts.In an unadjusted prospective model in normal subjects, both A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels in 1998-1999 were associated with incident AD (n = 55) in 2002-2003 (longitudinal analysis). In the fully adjusted multivariate model, neither A beta 1-42 nor A beta 1-40 nor their ratio was associated with incident AD. However, adjustment had a very small effect on point estimates for A beta 1-42, from an odds ratio (OR) of 1.61 (p = 0.007) in the unadjusted model to an OR of 1.46 (p = 0.08) in the fully adjusted model. In 2002-2003 (cross-sectional analysis), only the unadjusted models showed that both peptides were associated with AD.Plasma A beta levels are affected by age and by systemic and CNS vascular risk factors. After controlling for these conditions, A beta-40 and A beta 1-42 are weak predictors of conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) in normal subjects and are only weakly associated with AD in cross-sectional analysis. Consequently, plasma levels of A beta do not seem to be useful biomarkers for AD.CSF Abeta42 and tau or phosphorylated tau and prediction of progressive mild cognitive impairment.Baseline CSF amyloid beta-peptide-42 (Abeta42), tau, and phosphorylated tau (P-tau) levels from 46 control subjects and 78 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) were measured. Twenty-three patients with MCI developed dementia during the study. Abnormal biomarkers were found early in the course of Alzheimer disease (AD). The most predictive assay for AD among the patients with MCI was the combination of Abeta42 and P-tau.CSF levels of heart fatty acid binding protein are altered during early phases of Alzheimer's disease.Heart fatty acid binding protein (HFABP) has been proposed as a putative marker for dementia disorders. To evaluate the value of this protein as an early marker of Alzheimer's disease (AD), we analyzed HFABP level and the classical biomarkers amyloid-β (Aβ)1-42, total tau (t-tau), and phosphorylated tau (p-tau) in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) followed up for four years (n=41), AD (n=32), and subjects with other neurological diseases without dementia (OND, n=25). HFABP levels were higher in AD patients and in MCI converting to AD (MCI-AD) with respect to OND and to cognitively stable MCI patients (MCI-MCI). The receiver operator characteristics analysis for HFABP alone showed a sensitivity of 87% and a specificity of 81% for AD versus OND (area under the curve, AUC=0.83); sensitivity and specificity were 46% and 94%, respectively, when comparing MCI-MCI versus MCI-AD. CSF HFABP levels showed a strong positive correlation with both t-tau and p-tau. Interestingly, the ratio between HFABP and Aβ1-42 improved the performance in distinguishing AD from OND (sensitivity: 90%; specificity 82%, AUC=0.89), and gave the best accuracy in discriminating MCI-AD from MCI-MCI (sensitivity: 80%; specificity 100%, AUC=0.90). Survival analysis by means of Kaplan-Meier curve showed a significantly higher proportion of MCI patients converting to AD in the group with higher values of HFABP/Aβ1-42 ratio (cut-off=0.7). A significant correlation between HFABP/Aβ1-42 ratio and MMSE annual decrease rate was also documented (p<0.0001). HFABP /Aβ1-42 ratio might be a useful predictor of conversion in MCI patients.Rapid progression from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease in subjects with elevated levels of tau in cerebrospinal fluid and the APOE epsilon4/epsilon4 genotype.Increased cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) tau, decreased CSF amyloid-beta42 (Abeta42) and the apolipoprotein E gene (APOE) epsilon4 allele predict progression from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD). Here, we investigated these markers to assess their predictive value and influence on the rate of disease progression.Using ELISA, we measured the CSF biomarkers in 47 AD patients, 58 patients with MCI and 35 healthy control subjects. Twenty-eight MCI patients revisited the clinic and half of them progressed to AD during a period of 3-12 years.The expected changes in CSF total (T)-tau, phosphorylated (P)-tau and Abeta42 levels were found in AD, confirming the diagnostic value of these biomarkers. We were also able to corroborate an increased risk for progression from MCI to AD with elevated CSF T-tau and P-tau and with the presence of the APOE epsilon4/epsilon4 genotype, but not with decreased Abeta42. Finally, for the first time we demonstrated that MCI subjects with high CSF T-tau or P-tau and APOE epsilon4 homozygosity progressed faster from MCI to AD.CSF T-tau and P-tau as well as the APOE epsilon4/epsilon4 genotype are robust predictors of AD and are also associated with a more rapid progression from MCI to AD.Cerebrospinal fluid biomarkers for Alzheimer’s disease: diagnostic performance in a homogeneous mono-center population.The cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers amyloid-β (Aβ)(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau have good diagnostic accuracy for clinically diagnosed Alzheimer’s disease (AD). However, in multi-center studies, the predictive values of the CSF biomarkers have been lower, possibly due to differences in procedures for lumbar puncture and CSF handling and storage, and to differences in patient populations, clinical evaluations, and diagnostic procedures. Here we investigate the diagnostic accuracy of CSF biomarkers in a well defined homogeneous mono-center population. We also evaluate an extended panel of amyloid related biomarkers. Sixty consecutive patients admitted for cognitive impairment to a memory clinic were recruited. The participants included patients with AD or mild cognitive impairment (MCI) diagnosed with AD upon follow-up (n = 32), patients with stable MCI (n = 13), patients with other dementias diagnosed at primary evaluation or upon follow-up (n = 15), and healthy controls(n = 20). CSF was analyzed for Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau, and PA(X-38), Aβ(X-40), Aβ(X-42), sAβPPα, and sAβPPβ. In multivariate analysis, thecore biomarkers Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau demonstrated a high ability to diagnose AD versus the combined groups of controls and stable MCI, with an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) of 0.97 (95% CI 0.93–1.00, p < 0.0001). The additional biomarkers only marginally increased AUROC to 0.98 (95% CI 0.95–1.00, p < 0.0001), this increase mainly mediated by Aβ(X-42). In conclusion, CSF biomarkers Aβ(1-42), T-tau, and P-tau have very high diagnostic accuracy in a well defined cohort of untreated patients, demonstrating the excellent potency of CSF biomarkers to identify pathological processes in AD when astringent analytical protocol is used.Differential CSF biomarker levels in APOE-epsilon4-positive and -negative patients with memory impairment.To investigate the relationships between episodic memory, APOE genotype, CSF markers (total tau, T-tau; phospho-tau, P-tau; beta-amyloid, Abeta42) and longitudinal cognitive decline.124 memory clinic patients were retrospectively divided into 6 groups based on (i) episodic memory function (Rey Auditory Verbal Learning Test, RAVLT): severe, moderate or no impairment (SIM, MIM or NIM), and (ii) APOE genotype (epsilon4+ or epsilon4-). CSF marker levels and cognitive decline were compared across groups.Episodic memory function, according to RAVLT scores, was significantly correlated with CSF marker levels only among epsilon4+ subjects and not among epsilon4- subjects. When comparing the 6 subgroups, SIM epsilon4+ and MIM epsilon4+ groups showed significantly lower Abeta42 levels than the other groups. T-tau and P-tau levels were significantly increased in SIM epsilon4+ when compared to all the other groups, including the SIM epsilon4- group. However, both SIM epsilon4+ and SIM epsilon4- declined cognitively during the follow-up.It remains to be determined whether APOE genotype affects the expression of biomarkers in CSF, or whether the different biomarker patterns reflect different types of disease processes in patients with progressive cognitive dysfunction.Amyloid-beta42 plasma levels are elevated in amnestic mild cognitive impairment.Amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI) is considered a prodromal stage of Alzheimer's disease (AD). We measured plasma levels of amyloid-beta40 (Abeta40) and Abeta42 in 191 subjects with aMCI. Seventy-nine of them were clinically followed for two years. In the total cohort of aMCI cases, the average level of Abeta42, as well as the Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio, was significantly higher than those of the 102 cognitively normal age-matched subjects. The aMCI cases that converted to probable AD within 2 years had higher levels of Abeta42 and, to a lesser extent, Abeta40 than the stable cases. However the large variability of measured values indicates that plasma Abeta is not a suitable marker of incipient AD.Elevation of {beta}-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies in the blood of amnestic patients with mild cognitive impairment.To develop a blood-based test for screening populations at risk for Alzheimer disease.Case-control study. Subjects A total of 180 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and 105 age-matched, cognitively normal controls.The titer of beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies in the plasma was obtained at the time of diagnosis and evaluated by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay before and after dissociation of the antigen-antibody complexes. A total of 107 patients with MCI were followed up for 36 months; 70 of the 107 cases progressed to Alzheimer disease.The average level of beta-amyloid 1-42 plasma autoantibodies in patients with MCI that progressed to Alzheimer disease, but not that of the stable cases, was significantly higher than in cognitively normal controls (P < .001).The results suggest that the plasma beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies parallel beta-amyloid 42 deposition in the brain, which is known to precede by several years the clinical onset of Alzheimer disease. The evaluation of beta-amyloid 1-42 autoantibodies after dissociation of the complexes is a simple and inexpensive method that can be used to predict the occurrence of Alzheimer disease.CSF Abeta42, tau and phosphorylated tau correlate with medial temporal lobe atrophy.Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers and medial temporal lobe (MTL) atrophy predict the progression of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD). We investigated the association between the CSF biomarkers and MTL atrophy and the ability of these measures to predict AD in MCI patients in the same study population. The study included 21 MCI patients of whom eight progressed to AD during the study. CSF biomarkers were measured by using ELISA method and volumes of MTL structures were assessed by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Abeta42 levels were lower and tau and phospho-tau levels were higher in progressive subjects. The progressive subjects had lower volumes in all MRI measures. Tau and phospho-tau correlated inversely with hippocampal volumes and left entorhinal cortex volume in the whole study group. In the stable group, tau correlated with hippocampal volumes. Phospho-tau [corrected] had a negative correlation whereas Abeta42 [corrected] exhibited a positive correlation with left hippocampal volume in the progressive group. These results indicate that both measures may reflect the ongoing neurodegenerative process in the progressive MCI patients. However, the order of the changes in the CSF biomarkers and MTL atrophy remain unclear due to a small number of studied subjects and study design.Evaluation of plasma Abeta(40) and Abeta(42) as predictors of conversion to Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Numerous studies have shown a marked decrease of beta-amyloid(42) (Abeta(42)) in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) of patients with incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD). However, studies on Abeta in plasma are contradictory, and show very marginal differences between patients and controls. Here, we analyzed plasma samples using a new multiplex immunoassay for simultaneous analysis of Abeta(1-40), Abeta(n-40), Abeta(1-42), and Abeta(n-42). The plasma samples were obtained at baseline from two independent cohorts of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and age-matched controls. In the first cohort, 41% of the 117 MCI cases converted to AD during a clinical follow-up period of 4-7 years. In the second cohort, 14% of the 110 MCI subjects developed AD during a clinical follow-up period of 2-4 years. None of the plasma Abeta isoforms differed between MCI patients that subsequently developed AD and healthy controls or stable MCI patients. The Cox proportional hazards model did not reveal any differences in the probability of progression from MCI to AD related to plasma Abeta levels. In contrast, low levels of Abeta(1-42) in CSF were strongly associated with increased risk of future AD. The absence of a change in plasma Abeta in incipient AD, despite the marked change in CSF, may be explained by the lack of a correlation between the levels of Abeta(1-42) in CSF and plasma. In conclusion, the results show that CSF biomarkers are better predictors of progression to AD than plasma Abeta isoforms.Association between CSF biomarkers and incipient Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment: a follow-up study.Disease-modifying treatment strategies for Alzheimer's disease have led to an urgent need for biomarkers to identify the disease at a very early stage. Here, we assess the association between CSF biomarkers and incipient Alzheimer's in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).From a series of 180 consecutive patients with MCI, we assessed 137 who underwent successful lumbar puncture at baseline. Patients at risk of developing dementia were followed clinically for 4-6 years. Additionally, 39 healthy individuals, cognitively stable over 3 years, served as controls. We analysed CSF concentrations of beta amyloid(1-42) (Abeta42), total tau (T-tau), and phosphorylated tau (P-tau181) using Luminex xMAP technology.During follow-up, 57 (42%) patients with MCI developed Alzheimer's disease, 21 (15%) developed other forms of dementia, and 56 (41%) remained cognitively stable for 5.2 years (range 4.0-6.8). A combination of CSF T-tau and Abeta42 at baseline yielded a sensitivity of 95% and a specificity of 83% for detection of incipient AD in patients with MCI. The relative risk of progression to Alzheimer's disease was substantially increased in patients with MCI who had pathological concentrations of T-tau and Abeta42 at baseline (hazard ratio 17.7, p<0.0001). The association between pathological CSF and progression to Alzheimer's disease was much stronger than, and independent of, established risk factors including age, sex, education, APOE genotype, and plasma homocysteine. The combination of T-tau and Abeta42/P-tau181 ratio yielded closely similar results (sensitivity 95%, specificity 87%, hazard ratio 19.8).Concentrations of T-tau, P-tau181, and Abeta42 in CSF are strongly associated with future development of Alzheimer's disease in patients with MCI.Cerebrospinal fluid tau and beta-amyloid 42 proteins identify Alzheimer disease in subjects with mild cognitive impairment.Cerebrospinal fluid tau protein and beta-amyloid 42 (Abeta42) protein are altered even in very mild Alzheimer disease (AD). So far, few data exist for subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).To investigate the potential of cerebrospinal fluid tau and Abeta42 for predicting progression from MCI to AD in a longitudinal study of 28 patients with MCI who received follow-up for 18 months.An 18-month prospective study.Clinical follow-up study of community-residing subjects with MCI.Cerebrospinal fluid tau and Abeta42 concentrations were measured using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay at baseline. The potential of both biomarkers was evaluated to predict the progression to dementia, the end point of this study, using multiple logistic regression analysis.Of 28 subjects with MCI, 12 progressed to dementia (2 to frontotemporal dementia; 10 to AD). Six subjects had progressive MCI, and 10 subjects showed stable MCI. Cerebrospinal fluid tau levels were significantly elevated in patients who progressed to probable AD (P =.002) and subjects with progressive MCI (P =.003) compared with subjects who had stable MCI. Cerebrospinal fluid Abeta42 levels were significantly lower in patients who progressed to probable AD (P =.007) and those with progressive MCI (P =.04) than in subjects with stable MCI. Logistic regression analysis identified elevated tau protein level as a predictor of cognitive deterioration (P =.02), whereas a delayed verbal recall score at baseline was significantly associated with the development of probable AD (P =.03).Our results indicate that altered tau and Abeta42 concentrations may be detectable in subjects who are clinically diagnosed as having MCI but demonstrate the pathological changes of AD.Cube copying test in combination with rCBF or CSF A beta 42 predicts development of Alzheimer's disease.The aim was to identify subjects with incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD) among patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) using brief cognitive tests.A total of 147 MCI patients were followed for 4-6 years and the incidence of AD was 11.6%/year. At baseline, the cube copying test, clock drawing test, MMSE and measurements of regional cerebral blood flow (rCBF) and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (A beta (42)) were performed.The cube copying test, but not the clock drawing test, could predict AD among MCI patients with an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of 0.64 (p < 0.01). The relative risk for future AD was increased in MCI subjects with impaired cube copying test (sex- and age-adjusted hazard ratio = 1.8, p < 0.05) and the incidence of AD was 18.2% in this subgroup. Combining the cube copying test with either rCBF or CSF A beta(42) had additive effects on the risk assessment for future development of AD. MCI patients achieving high scores on both MMSE and cube copying test had a very low risk of developing AD (incidence of AD = 1.6%).In conclusion, combinations of the cube copying test with MMSE, rCBF and CSF A beta (42) measurements can identify subgroups of MCI subjects with either substantially reduced or increased risk for future development of AD.Age and diagnostic performance of Alzheimer disease CSF biomarkers.Core CSF changes in Alzheimer disease (AD) are decreased amyloid β(1-42), increased total tau, and increased phospho-tau, probably indicating amyloid plaque accumulation, axonal degeneration, and tangle pathology, respectively. These biomarkers identify AD already at the predementia stage, but their diagnostic performance might be affected by age-dependent increase of AD-type brain pathology in cognitively unaffected elderly.We investigated effects of age on the diagnostic performance of CSF biomarkers in a uniquely large multicenter study population, including a cross-sectional cohort of 529 patients with AD dementia (median age 71, range 43-89 years) and 304 controls (67, 44-91 years), and a longitudinal cohort of 750 subjects without dementia with mild cognitive impairment (69, 43-89 years) followed for at least 2 years, or until dementia diagnosis.The specificities for subjects without AD and the areas under the receiver operating characteristics curves decreased with age. However, the positive predictive value for a combination of biomarkers remained stable, while the negative predictive value decreased only slightly in old subjects, as an effect of the high AD prevalence in older ages.Although the diagnostic accuracies for AD decreased with age, the predictive values for a combination of biomarkers remained essentially stable. The findings highlight biomarker variability across ages, but support the use of CSF biomarkers for AD even in older populations.CSF biomarkers and incipient Alzheimer disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Small single-center studies have shown that cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers may be useful to identify incipient Alzheimer disease (AD) in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), but large-scale multicenter studies have not been conducted.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of CSF beta-amyloid(1-42) (Abeta42), total tau protein (T-tau), and tau phosphorylated at position threonine 181 (P-tau) for predicting incipient AD in patients with MCI.The study had 2 parts: a cross-sectional study involving patients with AD and controls to identify cut points, followed by a prospective cohort study involving patients with MCI, conducted 1990-2007. A total of 750 individuals with MCI, 529 with AD, and 304 controls were recruited by 12 centers in Europe and the United States. Individuals with MCI were followed up for at least 2 years or until symptoms had progressed to clinical dementia.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) of CSF Abeta42, T-tau, and P-tau for identifying incipient AD.During follow-up, 271 participants with MCI were diagnosed with AD and 59 with other dementias. The Abeta42 assay in particular had considerable intersite variability. Patients who developed AD had lower median Abeta42 (356; range, 96-1075 ng/L) and higher P-tau (81; range, 15-183 ng/L) and T-tau (582; range, 83-2174 ng/L) levels than MCI patients who did not develop AD during follow-up (579; range, 121-1420 ng/L for Abeta42; 53; range, 15-163 ng/L for P-tau; and 294; range, 31-2483 ng/L for T-tau, P < .001). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve was 0.78 (95% confidence interval [CI], 0.75-0.82) for Abeta42, 0.76 (95% CI, 0.72-0.80) for P-tau, and 0.79 (95% CI, 0.76-0.83) for T-tau. Cut-offs with sensitivity set to 85% were defined in the AD and control groups and tested in the MCI group, where the combination of Abeta42/P-tau ratio and T-tau identified incipient AD with a sensitivity of 83% (95% CI, 78%-88%), specificity 72% (95% CI, 68%-76%), positive LR, 3.0 (95% CI, 2.5-3.4), and negative LR, 0.24 (95% CI, 0.21-0.28). The positive predictive value was 62% and the negative predictive value was 88%.This multicenter study found that CSF Abeta42, T-tau, and P-tau identify incipient AD with good accuracy, but less accurately than reported from single-center studies. Intersite assay variability highlights a need for standardization of analytical techniques and clinical procedures.Serial MRI and CSF biomarkers in normal aging, MCI, and AD.To compare the annual change in MRI and CSF biomarkers in cognitively normal (CN), amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI), and Alzheimer disease (AD). Comparisons were based on intergroup discrimination, correlation with concurrent cognitive/functional changes, relationships to APOE genotype, and sample sizes for clinical trials.We used data from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative study consisting of CN, aMCI, and AD cohorts with both baseline and 12-month follow-up CSF and MRI. The annual change in CSF (total-tau [t-tau], Abeta(1-42)) and MRI (change in ventricular volume) was obtained in 312 subjects (92 CN, 149 aMCI, 71 AD).There was no significant average annual change in either CSF biomarker in any clinical group except t-tau in CN; moreover, the annual change did not differ by clinical group in pairwise comparisons. In contrast, annual increase in ventricular volume increased in the following order, AD > aMCI > CN, and differences were significant between all clinical groups in pairwise comparisons. Ventricular volume increase correlated with concurrent worsening on cognitive/functional indices in aMCI and AD whereas evidence of a similar correlation with change in CSF measures was unclear. The annual changes in MRI differed by APOE epsilon4 status overall and among aMCI while annual changes in CSF biomarkers did not. Estimated sample sizes for clinical trials are notably less for MRI than the CSF or clinical measures.Unlike the CSF biomarkers evaluated, changes in serial structural MRI are correlated with concurrent change on general cognitive and functional indices in impaired subjects, track with clinical disease stage, and are influenced by APOE genotype.Cerebrospinal fluid markers for prediction of Alzheimer's disease.A major diagnostic challenge when people seek advice for cognitive dysfunction is to differentiate between mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD). We show that a combination of three cerebrospinal fluid biochemical markers, total-tau, phospho-tau and beta-amyloid(1-42), can detect incipient AD among patients fulfilling the criteria for MCI with a sensitivity of 68% (95% CI 45-86%) and a specificity of 97% (95% CI 83-100%). The usefulness of these markers is further emphasized by the finding of a positive predictive value of 94% and a negative predictive value of 81%.Prediction of Alzheimer's disease using the CSF Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Evidence supports an important role for beta-amyloid (Abeta) in the pathogenesis of Alzheimer's disease (AD). Here, we investigate baseline levels of the 40- and 42-amino-acid-long Abeta peptides (Abeta40 and Abeta42) in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) from a cohort of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI, n = 137) in relation to the final diagnosis after 4-6 years of follow-up time. CSF Abeta42 concentration at baseline and the Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio were significantly decreased in the MCI patients who developed AD as compared to cognitively stable MCI patients and MCI patients who developed other forms of dementia (p < 0.001). The baseline levels of Abeta40 were similar in all MCI groups but correlated with change in Mini Mental State Examination scores in converters to AD. The Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio was superior to Abeta42 concentration with regard to identifying incipient AD in MCI (p < 0.05). In conclusion, the data provide further support for the view that amyloid precursor protein metabolism is disturbed in early sporadic AD and points to the usefulness of the Abeta42/Abeta40 ratio as a predictive biomarker for AD.Subcortical vascular dementia biomarker pattern in mild cognitive impairment.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) is an etiologically unclear disorder. Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers are potentially useful for the differentiation between various MCI etiologies.The aim of the study was to assess whether baseline CSF hyperphosphorylated tau (P-tau), total tau (T-tau), amyloid beta 1-42 (Abeta(42)) and neurofilament light (NF-L) in patients with MCI could predict subcortical vascular dementia (SVD) and Alzheimer's disease (AD) at follow-up.Biomarker levels were assessed by Luminex xMAP technology and ELISA.Increased baseline concentrations of NF-L significantly separated MCI-SVD from stable MCI. The MCI-SVD patients were inseparable from stable MCI but separable from patients developing AD (MCI-AD) on the basis of Abeta(42,) T-tau and P-tau(181) levels.A combination of the biomarkers Abeta(42), T-tau, P-tau(181) and NF-L has the potential to improve the clinical separation of MCI-SVD patients from stable MCI and MCI-AD patients.Combination of P300 and CSF β-amyloid(1-42) assays may provide a potential tool in the early diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease.The aim of this study was to investigate the diagnostic role of CSF beta amyloid(1-42) levels and auditory event-related potentials (AERPs) in the progression of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD).In fifty three MCI patients a lumbar puncture was performed and beta amyloid(1-42) levels were determined. Twenty patients were re-examined after 11 months. During this period five of them progressed to AD. Neuropsychological and ERP examinations were performed in all patients at both exams.Compared to MCI stable patients, AD-converters showed significantly lower beta-amyloid(1-42) values both for group 1 (Mann Whitney test, Z=-2.952, p=0.003, effect size r=-0.41) and group 2 (Z=-2.458, p=0.011; effect size r=-0.55). On the other hand, the patients of group 1 who converted to AD had prolonged latencies and lower amplitudes of the P300 wave compared to those of the MCI-stable patients, although the differences were not significant.Compared to the separate use of CSF beta-amyloid(1-42) and AERPs, higher values of sensitivity and specificity were achieved by the combined use of beta-amyloid(1-42) levels and P300 latencies (80% and 98%) or amplitudes (100% and 89%) in the discrimination between AD converters and MCI stable patients. Therefore the combination of an electrophysiological and a biological marker is potentially of high diagnostic value for the early diagnosis of AD converters.Cerebrospinal fluid profiles and prospective course and outcome in patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment.To examine the effect of specific cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) profiles on the rate of cognitive decline, disease progression, and risk of conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) dementia in patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (MCI).Total tau (T-tau), tau phosphorylated at threonine 181, and β-amyloid 1-42 peptide (Aβ42) were immunoassayed in CSF samples obtained from patients with MCI enrolled in the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative. Patients were then stratified by CSF profiles: (1) normal T-tau and normal Aβ42 (ie, normal-T-tauAβ42), (2) normal T-tau but abnormal Aβ42 (ie, abnormal-Aβ42), (3) abnormal T-tau but normal Aβ42 (ie, abnormal-T-tau), and (4) abnormal T-tau and abnormal Aβ42 (ie, abnormal-T-tauAβ42).Fifty-eight sites in the United States and Canada.One hundred ninety-five patients with MCI.A composite cognitive measure, the Clinical Dementia Rating Scale-sum of boxes subscale, and conversion to AD dementia.Patients with MCI with a CSF profile of abnormal-Aβ42 or abnormal-T-tauAβ42 experienced a faster rate of decline on the composite cognitive measure and the Clinical Dementia Rating Scale-sum of boxes subscale compared with those with normal-T-tauAβ42. They also had a greater risk of converting to AD dementia relative to the normal-T-tauAβ42 group. In contrast, those with a CSF profile of abnormal-T-tau did not differ from the normal-T-tauAβ42 group on any outcome. These findings were generally replicated when the sample was reclassified by patterns of tau phosphorylated at threonine 181 and Aβ42 abnormalities.β-Amyloid abnormalities but not tau alterations are associated with cognitive deterioration, disease progression, and increased risk of conversion to AD dementia in patients with MCI. Patients with abnormal Aβ42 may be prime candidates for drug treatment and clinical trials in MCI.Cerebrospinal fluid biomarker signature in Alzheimer's disease neuroimaging initiative subjects.Develop a cerebrospinal fluid biomarker signature for mild Alzheimer's disease (AD) in Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI) subjects.Amyloid-beta 1 to 42 peptide (A beta(1-42)), total tau (t-tau), and tau phosphorylated at the threonine 181 were measured in (1) cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) samples obtained during baseline evaluation of 100 mild AD, 196 mild cognitive impairment, and 114 elderly cognitively normal (NC) subjects in ADNI; and (2) independent 56 autopsy-confirmed AD cases and 52 age-matched elderly NCs using a multiplex immunoassay. Detection of an AD CSF profile for t-tau and A beta(1-42) in ADNI subjects was achieved using receiver operating characteristic cut points and logistic regression models derived from the autopsy-confirmed CSF data.CSF A beta(1-42) was the most sensitive biomarker for AD in the autopsy cohort of CSF samples: receiver operating characteristic area under the curve of 0.913 and sensitivity for AD detection of 96.4%. In the ADNI cohort, a logistic regression model for A beta(1-42), t-tau, and APO epsilon 4 allele count provided the best assessment delineation of mild AD. An AD-like baseline CSF profile for t-tau/A beta(1-42) was detected in 33 of 37 ADNI mild cognitive impairment subjects who converted to probable AD during the first year of the study.The CSF biomarker signature of AD defined by A beta(1-42) and t-tau in the autopsy-confirmed AD cohort and confirmed in the cohort followed in ADNI for 12 months detects mild AD in a large, multisite, prospective clinical investigation, and this signature appears to predict conversion from mild cognitive impairment to AD.Longitudinal cerebrospinal fluid biomarkers over four years in mild cognitive impairment.Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) measurements of amyloid-β42 (Aβ42), total-tau (T-tau), and phosphorylated tau (P-tau) may be used to predict future Alzheimer's disease (AD) dementia in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). The precise temporal development of these biomarkers in relation to clinical progression is unclear. Earlier studies have been hampered by short follow-up. In an MCI cohort, we selected 15 patients who developed AD (MCI-AD) and 15 who remained cognitively stable during 4 years of follow-up. CSF was sampled at three serial occasions from each patient and analyzed for Aβ peptides, the soluble amyloid-β protein precursor protein fragments sAβPPα and sAβPPβ, T-tau, P-tau, and chromogranin B, which is a protein linked to regulated neuronal secretion. We also measured, for the first time in MCI patients, an extended panel of Aβ peptides by matrix-assisted-laser-desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (MS). Most biomarkers were surprisingly stable over the four years with coefficients of variation below or close to 10%. However, MCI-AD patients decreased in CSF AβX₋₄₀ and chromogranin B concentrations, which may indicate a reduced number of functional neurons or synapses with disease progression. The MS Aβ peptide panel was more useful than any single Aβ peptide to identify MCI-AD patients already at baseline. Knowledge on these biomarkers and their trajectories may facilitate early diagnosis of AD and be useful in future clinical trials to track effects of disease modifying drugs.Plasma Abeta42 and Abeta40 as markers of cognitive change in follow-up: a prospective, longitudinal, population-based cohort study.Single measurements of plasma Aβ are not useful in the diagnostics of Alzheimer's disease (AD). However, changes in plasma Aβ levels during repeated testing may be helpful in the prediction and evaluation of progression of the incipient AD or mild cognitive impairment.To examine the relation of baseline and serial plasma Aβ levels to cognitive change in follow-up.269 subjects (52 cognitively impaired and 217 controls) from a population-based cohort were clinically followed up from 3 to 6 years. Serial plasma samples were available from 70 subjects who were followed up for 3 years and 43 subjects followed for 6 years. The plasma Aβ levels were measured using ELISA.Subjects who declined cognitively during the follow-up had lower levels of plasma Aβ42 at the baseline. Plasma Aβ42 and the Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio decreased (-2.4 pg/ml for Aβ42 in 6 years) in those who declined in follow-up, whereas Aβ42 and the Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio increased in the subjects who remained cognitively stable or improved in follow-up. Subjects using acetylsalicylic acid, dipyridamole, antidiabetic or anticoagulant drugs as well as subjects with coronary heart disease had higher levels of Aβ40.Low or decreasing plasma Aβ42 during the follow-up is associated with cognitive decline. Serial measurement of plasma Aβ42 may be useful in the detection of the subjects who are at risk for cognitive decline.Longitudinal changes of CSF biomarkers in Alzheimer's disease.Longitudinal changes of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers in Alzheimer's disease (AD) have been studied, but there are few consistent conclusions and even less is known about their variation during the different stages of the disease. We hypothesized that changes in CSF biomarker values would correlate with the progression of the cognitive decline in AD. One hundred and thirty-one memory clinic patients [56 AD, 57 mild cognitive impairment (MCI), 10 other neurological disorders, eight unimpaired subjects] underwent a clinical follow-up with repeated Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) tests and two lumbar punctures with a median interval of 3 years. Levels of CSF amyloid-β (Aβ)(42), tau, and p-tau-181 were measured using commercially available ELISA. Twenty-one of the MCI subjects progressed to AD, whereas 26 subjects remained stable and 56 subjects had AD already at the baseline. The subjects displaying the most rapid MMSE decline rate had the lowest baseline Aβ(42), highest tau, and highest p-tau-181 CSF concentrations. An annual decrease of 2.20 pg/ml/year in the CSF p-tau-181 concentration was seen in AD-AD patients (p = 0.001). The difference was significant compared to stable MCI-MCI (increase of 1.24 pg/ml/year, p = 0.001) and cognitively healthy (increase of 0.84 pg/ml/year, p = 0.013) subjects (p for group difference 0.004). The decrease rate of p-tau-181 correlated with the MMSE decrease rate in AD subjects (r = 0.579, p < 0.001). The CSF Aβ(42) level decreased in the AD-AD group (decrease 11.9 pg/ml/year, p < 0.001). Concentrations of hyperphosphorylated tau decline in the late stages of the AD process. The decrease of p-tau-181 appears to correlate with cognitive functioning and probably reflects neuronal loss. More longitudinal studies of CSF biomarker dynamics are needed, especially in patients during the preclinical stage of the disease.Biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease in the cerebrospinal fluid of Spanish patients with mild cognitive impairment.The study of biomarkers in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) is a technique used with increasing frequency in the early diagnosis of Alzheimers disease (AD). Our objectiv was to gain an own experience while evaluating the reliability, sensitivity, and reproducibility of this technique in Spanish patients. Thirty-seven patients with MCI and twenty-four control subjects were studied by means of AD biomarker analysis in CSF. xMAP Luminex and INNO-BIA Alzbio3 reagents of Innogenetics were used. The study variables assessed were levels of Aβ(1-42), T-tau and P-tau(181p) proteins as well as the ratios of T-tau/Aβ(1-42) and P-tau(181p)/Aβ(1-42). Samples from nineteen patients were examined twice. Intra-class correlation coefficients for the three biomarkers used showed values higher than 0.95. We observed significant differences between the control group and the MCI groups. In the 6 months following lumbar puncture (LP), eleven (29%) patients with MCI developed AD. These patients showed significant lower levels in Aβ(1-42) protein (276.35 ± 78 vs. 367.13 ± 123.49, P < 0.03) and higher ratios (T-tau/Aβ(1-42) [0.38 ± 0.2 vs. 0.22 ± 0.14, P < 0.01] and P-tau(181p)/Aβ(1-42) [0.27 ± 0.13 vs. 0.16 ± 0.1, P < 0.008]) to those in the same group who remained stable. We obtained similar results to those in the most recent reliable literature with our ROC curves, especially with our P-tau(181p) values and T-tau/Aβ(1-42) ratio in order to differentiate between control and AD groups. Our experience showed that the analysis of CSF-AD biomarkers in patients with MCI is reliable, sensitive and reproducible. In our knowledge, this is the first experience in Spanish patients.Value of CSF beta-amyloid1-42 and tau as predictors of Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) are at a high risk of developing clinical Alzheimer's disease (AD). We asked to what extent the core biomarker candidates cerebro-spinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (Abeta(1-42)) and CSF tau protein concentrations predict conversion from MCI to AD. We studied 52 patients with MCI, 93 AD patients, and 10 healthy controls (HC). The MCI group was composed of 29 patients who had converted to AD during follow-up, and of 23 patients who showed no cognitive decline. CSF Abeta(1-42) and tau protein levels were assessed at baseline in all subjects, using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. For assessment of sensitivity and specificity, we used independently established reference values for CSF Abeta(1-42) and CSF tau. The levels of CSF tau were increased, whereas levels of Abeta(1-42) were decreased in MCI subjects. Abeta(1-42) predicted AD in converted MCI with a sensitivity of 59% and a specificity of 100% compared to HC. Tau yielded a greater sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 90%. In a multiple Cox regression analysis within the MCI group, low baseline levels of Abeta(1-42), but not other predictor variables (tau protein, gender, age, apolipoprotein E epsilon4 carrier status, Mini Mental Status Examination score, observation time, antidementia therapy), correlated with conversion status (P<0.05). Our findings support the notion that CSF tau and Abeta(1-42) may be useful biomarkers in the early identification of AD in MCI subjects.Cerebrospinal fluid levels of β-amyloid 1-42, but not of tau, are fully changed already 5 to 10 years before the onset of Alzheimer dementia.Early detection of prodromal Alzheimer disease (AD) is important because new disease-modifying therapies are most likely to be effective when initiated during the early stages of disease.To assess the ability of the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers total tau (T-tau), phosphorylated tau (P-tau), and β-amyloid 1-42 (Aβ42) to predict future development of AD dementia within 9.2 years in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and to compare CSF biomarkers between early and late converters to AD.A clinical study with a median follow-up of 9.2 years (range, 4.1-11.8 years).Memory disorder clinic. Patients A total of 137 patients with MCI who underwent lumbar puncture at baseline. MAIN OUTCOME MEASURE Conversion to AD dementia.During follow-up, 72 patients (53.7%) developed AD and 21 (15.7%) progressed to other forms of dementia. At baseline, CSF Aβ42 levels were reduced and T-tau and P-tau levels were elevated in patients who converted to AD during follow-up compared with nonconverters (P < .001). Baseline CSF Aβ42 levels were equally reduced in patients with MCI who converted to AD within 0 to 5 years (early converters) compared with those who converted between 5 and 10 years (late converters). However, CSF T-tau and P-tau levels were significantly higher in early converters vs late converters. A baseline Aβ42:P-tau ratio predicted the development of AD within 9.2 years with a sensitivity of 88%, specificity of 90%, positive predictive value of 91%, and negative predictive value of 86%.Approximately 90% of patients with MCI and pathologic CSF biomarker levels at baseline develop AD within 9 to 10 years. Levels of Aβ42 are already fully decreased at least 5 to 10 years before conversion to AD dementia, whereas T-tau and P-tau seem to be later markers. These results provide direct support in humans for the hypothesis that altered Aβ metabolism precedes tau-related pathology and neuronal degeneration.Diagnosis-independent Alzheimer disease biomarker signature in cognitively normal elderly people.To identify biomarker patterns typical for Alzheimer disease (AD) in an independent, unsupervised way, without using information on the clinical diagnosis.Mixture modeling approach.Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative database.Cognitively normal persons, patients with AD, and individuals with mild cognitive impairment.Cerebrospinal fluid-derived beta-amyloid protein 1-42, total tau protein, and phosphorylated tau(181P) protein concentrations were used as biomarkers on a clinically well-characterized data set. The outcome of the qualification analysis was validated on 2 additional data sets, 1 of which was autopsy confirmed.Using the US Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative data set, a cerebrospinal fluid beta-amyloid protein 1-42/phosphorylated tau(181P) biomarker mixture model identified 1 feature linked to AD, while the other matched the "healthy" status. The AD signature was found in 90%, 72%, and 36% of patients in the AD, mild cognitive impairment, and cognitively normal groups, respectively. The cognitively normal group with the AD signature was enriched in apolipoprotein E epsilon4 allele carriers. Results were validated on 2 other data sets. In 1 study consisting of 68 autopsy-confirmed AD cases, 64 of 68 patients (94% sensitivity) were correctly classified with the AD feature. In another data set with patients (n = 57) with mild cognitive impairment followed up for 5 years, the model showed a sensitivity of 100% in patients progressing to AD.The mixture modeling approach, totally independent of clinical AD diagnosis, correctly classified patients with AD. The unexpected presence of the AD signature in more than one-third of cognitively normal subjects suggests that AD pathology is active and detectable earlier than has heretofore been envisioned.Diagnosing prodromal Alzheimer's disease: role of CSF biochemical markers.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) is an aetiologically heterogeneous syndrome. A correct prediction of MCI conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD) represents a primary goal in routine clinical practice. Since the presence of pathological levels in >or=2 cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers; amyloid protein (Abeta42), total tau (h-tau) and phospho-tau (p-tau) seems to reliably identifying MCI subjects converting to AD, we report our experience in a routine clinical setting. In the period from January 2001 to June 2003, 273 consecutive patients referred to our Memory Clinic for diagnostic assessment of cognitive impairment. Of them, 180 underwent a complete diagnostic evaluation including CSF dosage of fragment 1-42 of amyloid protein, total tau and phospho-tau (ELISA Method, Innogenetics, Gent, Belgium), after vascular or other secondary causes of dementia could be excluded. At baseline, 38% of the MCI subjects (20/55) showed pathological levels in >or=2 CSF biomarkers. After 1 year, 11 MCI patients converted to dementia, 33 remained stable, 11 showed a further progression of cognitive impairment still not fulfilling the diagnostic criteria for dementia. Of the 11 converters, 10 showed >or=2 pathological values CSF biomarkers and in all of them, p-tau was high. On the contrary, 29 out of 33 stable MCI (88%) showed no or one pathological CSF value. We confirm that pathological levels in >or=2 CSF biomarkers reliably predict MCI conversion to AD and correctly identify the stable form of MCI.[The role of CSF markers in the early diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease].Biomarkers in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) are being used increasingly to diagnose early Alzheimer's disease (AD). A CSF profile that is suggestive of ad is an abnormal ratio of the proteins Ab1-42 to total tau.To describe the prevalence and prognosis of a CSF profile in patients without dementia but with subjective memory problems and mild cognitive impairments (MCI) at a memory clinic.A multi-centre study.A European multi-centre study showed that a CSF AD profile was often present in patients with subjective complaints and patients with MCI . The CSF AD profile predicted a decline in cognition and daily functioning over a period of 3 years in patients with MCI. Patients with amnestic MCI and a CSF AD profile developed AD more often within this period than patients without this profile.CSF markers suggestive of ad are common in persons without dementia. It may be possible to use these markers for the prognosis of patients who have MCI .Mapping correlations between ventricular expansion and CSF amyloid and tau biomarkers in 240 subjects with Alzheimer's disease, mild cognitive impairment and elderly controls.We aimed to improve on the single-atlas ventricular segmentation method of (Carmichael, O.T., Thompson, P.M., Dutton, R.A., Lu, A., Lee, S.E., Lee, J.Y., Kuller, L.H., Lopez, O.L., Aizenstein, H.J., Meltzer, C.C., Liu, Y., Toga, A.W., Becker, J.T., 2006. Mapping ventricular changes related to dementia and mild cognitive impairment in a large community-based cohort. IEEE ISBI. 315-318) by using multi-atlas segmentation, which has been shown to lead to more accurate segmentations (Chou, Y., Leporé, N., de Zubicaray, G., Carmichael, O., Becker, J., Toga, A., Thompson, P., 2008. Automated ventricular mapping with multi-atlas fluid image alignment reveals genetic effects in Alzheimer's disease, NeuroImage 40(2): 615-630); with this method, we calculated minimal numbers of subjects needed to detect correlations between clinical scores and ventricular maps. We also assessed correlations between emerging CSF biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease pathology and localizable deficits in the brain, in 80 AD, 80 mild cognitive impairment (MCI), and 80 healthy controls from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative. Six expertly segmented images and their embedded parametric mesh surfaces were fluidly registered to each brain; segmentations were averaged within subjects to reduce errors. Surface-based statistical maps revealed powerful correlations between surface morphology and 4 variables: (1) diagnosis, (2) depression severity, (3) cognitive function at baseline, and (4) future cognitive decline over the following year. Cognitive function was assessed using the mini-mental state exam (MMSE), global and sum-of-boxes clinical dementia rating (CDR) scores, at baseline and 1-year follow-up. Lower CSF Abeta(1-42) protein levels, a biomarker of AD pathology assessed in 138 of the 240 subjects, were correlated with lateral ventricular expansion. Using false discovery rate (FDR) methods, 40 and 120 subjects, respectively, were needed to discriminate AD and MCI from normal groups. 120 subjects were required to detect correlations between ventricular enlargement and MMSE, global CDR, sum-of-boxes CDR and clinical depression scores. Ventricular expansion maps correlate with pathological and cognitive measures in AD, and may be useful in future imaging-based clinical trials.CSF soluble amyloid precursor proteins in the diagnosis of incipient Alzheimer disease.To explore if soluble amyloid precursor proteins (sAPP) in CSF improve the identification of patients with incipient Alzheimer disease (AD) in a group of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).A cohort study with follow-up assessments of 58 patients with MCI with baseline CSF sampling was conducted: 21 patients had progressed to probable AD (MCI-AD), 27 still had MCI, 8 had reverted to normal (MCI-NAD), and 2 patients with frontotemporal dementia (FTD) were excluded. Sixteen additional patients with FTD were included to explore the specificity of the CSF markers. CSF concentrations of sAPPα, sAPPβ, tau, and Aβ(1-42) were measured with sensitive and specific ELISAs. Associations between diagnostic status, CSF protein concentrations, and other patient characteristics were explored using multiple logistic regression analyses with stepwise variable selection. The optimal sensitivity and specificity of the best models were derived from receiver operating characteristic curves.The MCI-AD group had significantly higher sAPPβ concentrations than the MCI-NAD and the FTD groups. A combination of sAPPβ, tau, and age differentiated the MCI-AD and the MCI-NAD groups with a sensitivity of 80.00% and a specificity of 81.00%. The best model for the differentiation of the MCI-AD and the FTD groups included sAPPβ and tau, and showed a sensitivity of 95.20% and a specificity of 81.20%. Aβ(1-42) and sAPPα did not significantly contribute to the models.These findings suggest that sAPPβ may be clinically useful, and superior to Aβ(1-42), in the early and differential diagnosis of incipient AD.Brain beta-amyloid measures and magnetic resonance imaging atrophy both predict time-to-progression from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease.Biomarkers of brain Aβ amyloid deposition can be measured either by cerebrospinal fluid Aβ42 or Pittsburgh compound B positron emission tomography imaging. Our objective was to evaluate the ability of Aβ load and neurodegenerative atrophy on magnetic resonance imaging to predict shorter time-to-progression from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's dementia and to characterize the effect of these biomarkers on the risk of progression as they become increasingly abnormal. A total of 218 subjects with mild cognitive impairment were identified from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative. The primary outcome was time-to-progression to Alzheimer's dementia. Hippocampal volumes were measured and adjusted for intracranial volume. We used a new method of pooling cerebrospinal fluid Aβ42 and Pittsburgh compound B positron emission tomography measures to produce equivalent measures of brain Aβ load from either source and analysed the results using multiple imputation methods. We performed our analyses in two phases. First, we grouped our subjects into those who were 'amyloid positive' (n = 165, with the assumption that Alzheimer's pathology is dominant in this group) and those who were 'amyloid negative' (n = 53). In the second phase, we included all 218 subjects with mild cognitive impairment to evaluate the biomarkers in a sample that we assumed to contain a full spectrum of expected pathologies. In a Kaplan-Meier analysis, amyloid positive subjects with mild cognitive impairment were much more likely to progress to dementia within 2 years than amyloid negative subjects with mild cognitive impairment (50 versus 19%). Among amyloid positive subjects with mild cognitive impairment only, hippocampal atrophy predicted shorter time-to-progression (P < 0.001) while Aβ load did not (P = 0.44). In contrast, when all 218 subjects with mild cognitive impairment were combined (amyloid positive and negative), hippocampal atrophy and Aβ load predicted shorter time-to-progression with comparable power (hazard ratio for an inter-quartile difference of 2.6 for both); however, the risk profile was linear throughout the range of hippocampal atrophy values but reached a ceiling at higher values of brain Aβ load. Our results are consistent with a model of Alzheimer's disease in which Aβ deposition initiates the pathological cascade but is not the direct cause of cognitive impairment as evidenced by the fact that Aβ load severity is decoupled from risk of progression at high levels. In contrast, hippocampal atrophy indicates how far along the neurodegenerative path one is, and hence how close to progressing to dementia. Possible explanations for our finding that many subjects with mild cognitive impairment have intermediate levels of Aβ load include: (i) individual subjects may reach an Aβ load plateau at varying absolute levels; (ii) some subjects may be more biologically susceptible to Aβ than others; and (iii) subjects with mild cognitive impairment with intermediate levels of Aβ may represent individuals with Alzheimer's disease co-existent with other pathologies.Prediction of conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease dementia based upon biomarkers and neuropsychological test performance.The current study tested the accuracy of primary MRI and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarker candidates and neuropsychological tests for predicting the conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD) dementia. In a cross-validation paradigm, predictor models were estimated in the training set of AD (N = 81) and elderly control subjects (N = 101). A combination of CSF t-tau/Aβ(1-4) ratio and MRI biomarkers or neuropsychological tests (free recall and trail making test B (TMT-B)) showed the best statistical fit in the AD vs. HC comparison, reaching a classification accuracy of up to 64% when applied to the prediction of MCI conversion (3.3-year observation interval, mean = 2.3 years). However, several single-predictor models showed a predictive accuracy of MCI conversion comparable to that of any multipredictor model. The best single predictors were right entorhinal cortex (prediction accuracy = 68.5% (95% CI (59.5, 77.4))) and TMT-B test (prediction accuracy 64.6% (95% CI (55.5, 73.4%))). In conclusion, short-term conversion to AD is predicted by single marker models to a comparable degree as by multimarker models in amnestic MCI subjects.Progression of mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease: improved diagnostic value of the combined use of N200 latency and beta-amyloid(1-42) levels.The aim of this study was to investigate the role of cerebrospinal fluid beta-amyloid(1-42) levels and auditory event-related potentials (AERPs) in the progress of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD).In 53 MCI patients, lumbar puncture was performed and beta-amyloid(1-42) levels were determined. Twenty patients were reexamined after 11 months. During this period, 5 of them progressed to AD. Neuropsychological and ERP analyses were performed on all patients during both baseline and endpoint examinations.Compared to stable MCI patients, those that progressed to AD had significantly lower beta-amyloid(1-42) levels (Mann-Whitney test, Z = -2.952, p = 0.003; effect size r = -0.41) and significantly prolonged N200 latencies (Mann-Whitney test, Z = -3.561, p < 0.001, effect size r = -0.49). From ERP variables, only the N200 latency significantly correlated with beta-amyloid(1-42) levels (baseline examination: r(s) = -0.421, p = 0.002; follow-up examination: r(s) = -0.574, p = 0.008).The combined use of these two parameters enabled discrimination of stable MCI patients from those who developed AD, with 100% sensitivity and specificity. Therefore, this method could be of high diagnostic value for the early diagnosis of AD.CSF Abeta42, Tau and phosphorylated Tau, APOE epsilon4 allele and MCI type in progressive MCI.The patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) have an elevated risk for Alzheimer's disease (AD). Especially the amnestic MCI is seen as prodrome of AD. Apolipoprotein E (APOE) epsilon4 allele, abnormal CSF Abeta42, Tau and phosphorylated Tau (phospho-Tau) levels are associated with elevated risk for AD.APOE genotyping was done by PCR based method and baseline CSF Abeta42, Tau and phospho-Tau were measured by ELISA from 60 controls and 79 MCI patients.Thirty-three MCI patients developed dementia during an average of 3.5 years follow-up. CSF Abeta42 was decreased and Tau and phospho-Tau were increased in the progressive MCI patients. The APOE epsilon4 allele was more frequent in the progressive MCI patients. The APOE epsilon4 allele showed a dose dependent association o the Abeta42 levels in the progressive MCI patients and to all of the markers in controls.Decreased CSF Abeta42 and elevated Tau or phospho-Tau together with APOE epsilon4 allele are highly predictive for the dementia in MCI patients with amnestic or executive symptoms.The new Alzheimer's criteria in a naturalistic series of patients with mild cognitive impairment.To test the validity of the new diagnostic criteria for Alzheimer's disease (AD) in a naturalistic series of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Ninety consecutive MCI patients were enrolled in a longitudinal study on the natural history of cognitive impairment. Medial temporal (MT) atrophy on MRI was defined as hippocampal volume below the fifth percentile of the distribution in healthy elders, abnormal CSF was based on Sjogren's cutoffs for Abeta42 and tau, and temporoparietal hypometabolism on 18F-FDG PET based on Herholz's t sum score. Patients were followed clinically to detect conversion to AD (MCI-AD), non-AD dementia (MCI-nAD), or no conversion (MCI-NC). The 24 MCI-AD and 15 MCI-nAD patients had sociodemographic, clinical, and neuropsychological baseline features similar to the 51 MCI-NC patients. All MCI patients with MT atrophy converted to AD, as did all those with abnormal CSF, but only 48 and 35% of those without MT atrophy or abnormal CSF converted (p on logrank test = 0.0007 and 0.001). Prediction of AD conversion was enhanced when positivity to either MT atrophy or abnormal CSF was considered, with only 15% of those MCI patients negative on both converting to AD (p < 0.0005). Markers were not predictive of non-AD dementia conversion. The accuracy of either MT atrophy or abnormal CSF in discriminating MCI-AD from MCI-NC was good (AUC 0.82, 95% CI 0.70-0.95). MT atrophy and abnormal CSF are the single most robust predictors of conversion to AD in MCI patients, and their combination enhances prediction. AD markers are not predictive of conversion to non-AD dementia.Longitudinal change of biomarkers in cognitive decline.To delineate the trajectories of Aβ42 level in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), fludeoxyglucose F18 (FDG) uptake using positron emission tomography, and hippocampal volume using magnetic resonance imaging and their relative associations with cognitive change at different stages in aging and Alzheimer disease (AD).Cohort study.The 59 study sites for the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative.A total of 819 participants 55 to 90 years of age with normal cognition, mild cognitive impairment, and AD who were followed up during the period from 2005 to 2007.Rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF, FDG uptake, hippocampal volume, and the Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale score during up to 36 months of follow-up by diagnostic group as well as prediction of cognitive change by each biomarker.Reductions in the level of Aβ42 in CSF were numerically greater in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD; whereas both glucose metabolic decline and hippocampal atrophy were significantly slower in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD. Positive APOE4 status accelerated hippocampal atrophic changes in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD, but did not modify rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF or FDG uptake. The Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale scores were related only to the baseline level of Aβ42 in CSF and the baseline FDG uptake in participants with normal cognition, which were about equally associated with change in FDG uptake and hippocampal volume in participants with mild cognitive impairment and best modeled by change in FDG uptake in participants with AD.Trajectories of Aβ42 level in CSF, FDG uptake, and hippocampal volume vary across different cognitive stages. The longitudinal patterns support a hypothetical sequence of AD pathology in which amyloid deposition is an early event before hypometabolism or hippocampal atrophy, suggesting that biomarker prediction for cognitive change is stage dependent.The relationship of plasma Aβ levels to dementia in aging individuals with mild cognitive impairment.Amyloid β(Aβ) peptides are important components of plaques in Alzheimer's disease(AD). A decrease in the CSF concentration of Aβ40 and Aβ42 is a potential biomarker for incident AD. In contrast, studies on plasma Aβ40 and Aβ42 concentrations have yielded contradictory results. To explore the relationship between plasma Aβ40 and Aβ42 concentrations and AD in aging individuals with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), evaluate the sensitivity and the specificity of plasma Aβ and their ratio as a marker for progression to AD. We measured baseline concentrations of Aβ40 and Aβ42, and their ratio in plasma of patients carefully categorized clinically and neurochemically as having AD or other dementias from a cohort of patients with MCI (n=588) after 4-6 years of follow-up time. Plasma concentrations of Aβ40, Aβ42 were measured using a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay technology. The association between plasma Aβ concentrations and the risk of dementia was assessed using Cox proportional hazard models. Optimal sensitivity and specificity of Aβ measurements were determined by ROC curve analysis. Plasma Aβ42 concentration and the Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio at baseline were significantly decreased in the MCI patients who developed AD as compared to cognitively stable MCI patients. The baseline concentrations of Aβ40 were similar in all MCI groups. The Aβ42/Aβ40 ratio was superior to Aβ42 concentration with regard to identify incipient AD in MCI. The ratio of Aβ42 to Aβ40 rather than absolute levels of the peptides can aid in the identification of incipient AD among MCI patients. A potential role of plasma Aβ concentrations as a marker of incipient dementia warrants further investigation.Two-year outcome of MCI subtypes and aetiologies in the Göteborg MCI study.The objective was to study the 2-year outcome of subjects diagnosed as having mild cognitive impairment (MCI).Two hundred and nine subjects diagnosed as having MCI were examined with a comprehensive neuropsychological test battery and followed up after 2 years.After 2 years, 34 subjects (16%) were lost for follow-up. Those subjects did not differ significantly in terms of MCI subclassification, MMSE score or age and education. Of the 175 subjects followed up, eight (4.5%) had improved to normal, two with amnestic MCI, one from multiple domains MCI, three with single domain MCI and two without any significant impairment at baseline. Forty-four subjects (25%) had progressed to dementia. Of these, 35 were from the multidomain amnestic group and nine from the multidomain non-amnestic group. The combination of Alzheimer-typical biomarkers (total-tau and amyloid beta) and multidomain amnestic MCI was the strongest predictor of progression to Alzheimer's disease, while vascular disease and multidomain amnestic MCI preceded mixed and vascular dementia.The results suggest that memory impairment alone, or impairment in any one cognitive domain alone, is a rather benign condition. Impairment in several cognitive domains is associated with a more severe outcome over 2 years. Also, 20% of the subjects who progressed to dementia, including Alzheimer's disease, did not show memory impairment at baseline, which suggests that memory impairment is not always the first symptom of even the most common dementia disorders.Cognitive reserve in relation to abeta42 in patients converting from MCI to dementia - a follow-up report.The concept of the cognitive reserve (CR) hypothesizes that premorbid factors such as education enable compensation for the manifestation of brain pathology. Accordingly, pathology should be more prominent in individuals with higher CR before becoming clinically apparent. Previously, we found that patients subsequently converting to dementia with higher CR had lower concentrations of amyloid beta 42 (abeta42) as compared to patients with lower CR. However, the interaction between time, biomarkers, neuropsychological performance and CR is yet to be established.To study the relation between biomarkers, neuropsychological performance and CR longitudinally.A mixed between-within subject analysis of variance was performed for longitudinal analysis. Paired t tests were used for within group comparisons.Patients with higher CR (n = 15) had significantly lower concentrations of abeta42 at both time points compared to those with medium (n = 23) and lower CR (n = 28). Also, abeta42 concentrations decreased significantly from baseline to follow-up in patients with higher and medium CR. Groups performed comparably on neuropsychological tests.This study provides further support for the applicability of abeta42 as a substitute for pathology in relation to CR. Also, abeta42 reflects the disease progression in patients with higher and medium CR.Progression from MCI to AD: predictive value of CSF Aβ42 is modified by APOE genotype.To study CSF biomarkers amyloid-beta 1-42 (Aβ42) and total tau (tau) in relation to APOE genotype in their ability to predict progression from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD).In 100 MCI patients CSF Aβ42, tau and APOE genotype were determined. At follow-up of 18 (13-24) months 58 patients remained non-progressive and 42 progressed to AD.Cox proportional hazards models showed an interaction between Aβ42 and APOE genotype (p<0.05). Stratification for APOE revealed HR (95% CI) for abnormal Aβ42 of 8.2 (2.1-31.9) for ε4 non-carriers, 3.9 (0.8-18.5) for heterozygotes and 0.3 (0.0-1.7) for homozygotes. Inversely, stratification for Aβ42 revealed that in patients with normal levels of Aβ42, ε4 homozygotes had a strongly increased risk of progression to AD with HR (95% CI) 20.8 (2.4-182.8). Tau and APOE independently predicted progression to AD.Aβ42 was a stronger predictor of progression to AD in APOE ε4 non-carriers than in carriers. Furthermore, the risk of progression for ε4 homozygotes was very high, also in patients with normal levels of Aβ42.Predicting MCI outcome with clinically available MRI and CSF biomarkers.To determine the ability of clinically available volumetric MRI (vMRI) and CSF biomarkers, alone or in combination with a quantitative learning measure, to predict conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI).We stratified 192 MCI participants into positive and negative risk groups on the basis of 1) degree of learning impairment on the Rey Auditory Verbal Learning Test; 2) medial temporal atrophy, quantified from Food and Drug Administration-approved software for automated vMRI analysis; and 3) CSF biomarker levels(.) We also stratified participants based on combinations of risk factors. We computed Cox proportional hazards models, controlling for age, to assess 3-year risk of converting to AD as a function of risk group and used Kaplan-Meier analyses to determine median survival times.When risk factors were examined separately, individuals testing positive showed significantly higher risk of converting to AD than individuals testing negative (hazard ratios [HR] 1.8-4.1). The joint presence of any 2 risk factors substantially increased risk, with the combination of greater learning impairment and increased atrophy associated with highest risk (HR 29.0): 85% of patients with both risk factors converted to AD within 3 years, vs 5% of those with neither. The presence of medial temporal atrophy was associated with shortest median dementia-free survival (15 months).Incorporating quantitative assessment of learning ability along with vMRI or CSF biomarkers in the clinical workup of MCI can provide critical information on risk of imminent conversion to AD.Progression from mild to pronounced MCI is not associated with cerebrospinal fluid biomarker deviations.Detection of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarker deviations improve prediction of progression from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to dementia. However, it is not settled whether the same pattern exists in patients progressing from very mild to more pronounced MCI. Given that neurodegenerative processes occur very early in the disease course, we also expected to find biomarker deviations in these patients.A total of 246 memory clinic patients with non-progressive (n = 161), progressive (n = 19), or converting (n = 66) MCI, 67 with stable dementia, and 80 controls were followed for 24 months. At baseline, CSF total tau (T-tau), β-amyloid 1-42 (Aβ42) and the light subunit of neurofilament protein (NFL) were determined.Patients with converting MCI and stable dementia had lower CSF Aβ42 concentrations and higher T-tau concentrations and NFL in comparison with controls and non-progressive/progressive MCI (p < 0.0005). No differences were found between progressive and non-progressive MCI.As expected, biomarker deviations predicted progression from MCI to dementia. Contrary to our hypothesis, progression from very mild MCI to more pronounced MCI was not reflected by biomarker deviations. The results suggest that the measured biomarkers are not early disease markers, or alternatively Alzheimer or vascular pathology is not the underlying cause in this patient group.Plasma amyloid levels and the risk of AD in normal subjects in the Cardiovascular Health Study.To examine the association between incident Alzheimer disease (AD), and plasma A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels in normal and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) subjects in a subgroup of participants of the Cardiovascular Health Study Cognition Study.We determined the plasma A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels of 274 nondemented subjects (232 normals and 42 with MCI) in 1998-1999 and repeated the measurements in 2002-2003. The mean age of the subjects at baseline was 79.3 +/- 3.6 years. We examined the association between A beta levels and incident AD over the ensuing 4.5 years, controlling for age, cystatin C level (marker of glomerular function), apolipoprotein E-4 allele, Modified-Mini-Mental State Examination scores, and MRI-identified infarcts.In an unadjusted prospective model in normal subjects, both A beta 1-40 and A beta 1-42 levels in 1998-1999 were associated with incident AD (n = 55) in 2002-2003 (longitudinal analysis). In the fully adjusted multivariate model, neither A beta 1-42 nor A beta 1-40 nor their ratio was associated with incident AD. However, adjustment had a very small effect on point estimates for A beta 1-42, from an odds ratio (OR) of 1.61 (p = 0.007) in the unadjusted model to an OR of 1.46 (p = 0.08) in the fully adjusted model. In 2002-2003 (cross-sectional analysis), only the unadjusted models showed that both peptides were associated with AD.Plasma A beta levels are affected by age and by systemic and CNS vascular risk factors. After controlling for these conditions, A beta-40 and A beta 1-42 are weak predictors of conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) in normal subjects and are only weakly associated with AD in cross-sectional analysis. Consequently, plasma levels of A beta do not seem to be useful biomarkers for AD.CSF Abeta42 and tau or phosphorylated tau and prediction of progressive mild cognitive impairment.Baseline CSF amyloid beta-peptide-42 (Abeta42), tau, and phosphorylated tau (P-tau) levels from 46 control subjects and 78 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) were measured. Twenty-three patients with MCI developed dementia during the study. Abnormal biomarkers were found early in the course of Alzheimer disease (AD). The most predictive assay for AD among the patients with MCI was the combination of Abeta42 and P-tau.CSF levels of heart fatty acid binding protein are altered during early phases of Alzheimer's disease.Heart fatty acid binding protein (HFABP) has been proposed as a putative marker for dementia disorders. To evaluate the value of this protein as an early marker of Alzheimer's disease (AD), we analyzed HFABP level and the classical biomarkers amyloid-β (Aβ)1-42, total tau (t-tau), and phosphorylated tau (p-tau) in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) followed up for four years (n=41), AD (n=32), and subjects with other neurological diseases without dementia (OND, n=25). HFABP levels were higher in AD patients and in MCI converting to AD (MCI-AD) with respect to OND and to cognitively stable MCI patients (MCI-MCI). The receiver operator characteristics analysis for HFABP alone showed a sensitivity of 87% and a specificity of 81% for AD versus OND (area under the curve, AUC=0.83); sensitivity and specificity were 46% and 94%, respectively, when comparing MCI-MCI versus MCI-AD. CSF HFABP levels showed a strong positive correlation with both t-tau and p-tau. Interestingly, the ratio between HFABP and Aβ1-42 improved the performance in distinguishing AD from OND (sensitivity: 90%; specificity 82%, AUC=0.89), and gave the best accuracy in discriminating MCI-AD from MCI-MCI (sensitivity: 80%; specificity 100%, AUC=0.90). Survival analysis by means of Kaplan-Meier curve showed a significantly higher proportion of MCI patients converting to AD in the group with higher values of HFABP/Aβ1-42 ratio (cut-off=0.7). A significant correlation between HFABP/Aβ1-42 ratio and MMSE annual decrease rate was also documented (p<0.0001). HFABP /Aβ1-42 ratio might be a useful predictor of conversion in MCI patients.Rapid progression from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease in subjects with elevated levels of tau in cerebrospinal fluid and the APOE epsilon4/epsilon4 genotype.Increased cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) tau, decreased CSF amyloid-beta42 (Abeta42) and the apolipoprotein E gene (APOE) epsilon4 allele predict progression from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD). Here, we investigated these markers to assess their predictive value and influence on the rate of disease progression.Using ELISA, we measured the CSF biomarkers in 47 AD patients, 58 patients with MCI and 35 healthy control subjects. Twenty-eight MCI patients revisited the clinic and half of them progressed to AD during a period of 3-12 years.The expected changes in CSF total (T)-tau, phosphorylated (P)-tau and Abeta42 levels were found in AD, confirming the diagnostic value of these biomarkers. We were also able to corroborate an increased risk for progression from MCI to AD with elevated CSF T-tau and P-tau and with the presence of the APOE epsilon4/epsilon4 genotype, but not with decreased Abeta42. Finally, for the first time we demonstrated that MCI subjects with high CSF T-tau or P-tau and APOE epsilon4 homozygosity progressed faster from MCI to AD.CSF T-tau and P-tau as well as the APOE epsilon4/epsilon4 genotype are robust predictors of AD and are also associated with a more rapid progression from MCI to AD.